10-K 1 ueec_10k.htm FORM 10-K
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 10-K
 
x ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
 
FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019
 
COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 000-27781
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as speciﬁed in its charter)
 
Nevada 84-1517723
(State of jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employee
Identiﬁcation Number)
   
10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209
Henderson, NV 89052
(Address of principal executive oﬃces) (Zip Code)
 
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (877) 358-3444
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (b) of the Act: None
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (g) of the Act: Common Stock, $.001 Par Value
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ¨ No x
 
Check whether the Registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act. ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to ﬁle such reports) and (2) has
been subject to such ﬁling requirements for the past 90 days. Yes x No ¨ 
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive data ﬁle required to be submitted pursuant to
Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was
required to submit such ﬁles). Yes x No ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has ﬁled a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the eﬀectiveness of
its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public
accounting ﬁrm that prepared or issued its audit report. x
 
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent ﬁlers in response to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained in this form, and no
disclosure will be contained, to the best of Registrant’s knowledge, in deﬁnitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference
in part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10 K ¨.
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a non-accelerated ﬁler, a smaller reporting
company, or an emerging growth company. See the deﬁnitions of “large accelerated ﬁler,” “accelerated ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company”
and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
 
Large accelerated ﬁler ¨ Accelerated ﬁler ¨
Non-accelerated ﬁler x Smaller reporting company x
    Emerging growth company ¨
 
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. Yes ¨ No ¨
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ¨ No x
 
As of June 28, 2019, the number of shares held by non-aﬃliates was approximately 172,779,765 shares. The approximate market value
based on the last sale (i.e. $0.94 per share as of June 28, 2019, the last business day of the second quarter) of the Company’s Common
Stock was approximately $162,412,979.
 
The number of shares issued and outstanding of the Registrant’s Common Stock, as of June 29, 2020 was 180,128,456, excluding restricted
stock units issued to oﬃcers, directors and consultants covering 50,100,000 shares to be issued upon a change in control of the Company
as described herein. See “Item 11.”
 
 
 
 
Forward-looking Statements
 
Statements in this annual report on Form 10-K that are not historical facts constitute forward-looking statements which are made pursuant
to the safe harbor provisions of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or the Exchange Act. These statements relate to future
events or our future ﬁnancial performance and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause our or our
industry’s actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to be materially diﬀerent from any future results, levels of
activity, performance or achievements expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements. Those factors include, among other
things, those listed under “Risk Factors” and elsewhere in this annual report. In some cases, you can identify forward-looking statements
by terminology such as “may,” “will,” “should,” “expects,” “plans,” “anticipates,” “believes,” “estimates,” “predicts,” “potential” or
“continue” or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. These statements are only predictions. Actual events or results
may diﬀer materially. Moreover, neither we nor any other person assumes responsibility.
 
Explanatory Note
  
In accordance with the SEC’s Order under Section 36 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Granting Exemptions From Speciﬁed Provisions
of the Exchange Act and Certain Rules Thereunder dated March 4, 2020 (Release No. 34-88318) (as modiﬁed on March 25, 2020 by Release
No. 34-88465, the “Order”), the Company relied on the relief provided by the Order in connection with the ﬁling of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the ﬁscal year ended December 31, 2019 (the “Report”) due to the circumstances related to coronavirus or COVID-19. The
impact of the COVID-19 outbreak has resulted in the implementation, by State and Federal authorities, of numerous measures to try to
contain the virus, such as travel bans and restrictions, quarantines, shelter in place orders, and shutdowns. The Company has been
following the recommendations of local authorities to minimize exposure risk to its team members, We were unable to ﬁle this Annual
Report on the extended March 30, 2020 due date because of the impact of COVID-19 as disclosed above.
 
Restatement:
 
General. This comprehensive Annual Report is for the year ended December 31, 2019, with expanded ﬁnancial and other disclosures in lieu
of ﬁling separate amended Annual Report on Form 10-K/A for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 and Quarterly Reports on Form
10-Q/A for each of the quarters ended March 31, 2017, June 30, 2017, September 30, 2017, March 31, 2018, June 30, 2018, September 30,
2018, March 31, 2019, June 30, 2019 and September 30, 2019. We believe that the ﬁling of this expanded annual report enables us to
provide information to investors in a more eﬃcient manner than separately ﬁling each of the amended ﬁlings described above.
 
As discussed in further detail below and in Note 2 to the accompanying ﬁnancial statements, the restatements of the prior ﬁlings are the
result of two separate transactions. The ﬁrst transaction was a revenue transaction that involved a sale of a lost in-bound shipment of
product that was recognized and recorded in the ﬁrst quarter of 2017. This sale was canceled in the second quarter of 2017 and the
transaction was subsequently corrected to back out the revenue and exclude it from the audited 2017 annual ﬁnancial statements which
were included in our 2017 Annual Report on Form 10-K. The Company inadvertently did not go back and restate the prior interim ﬁnancial
statements for 2017 to reﬂect the correction. The second transaction was a revenue transaction regarding product that was in the shipping
process at the end of December 2017 that was recognized and recorded as revenue in the 2017 audited annual ﬁnancial statements where
there was a question related to the timing of revenue recognition due to the shipping and receiving terms. The Company’s customer had
not paid the Company for this product and the Company, in consultation with its former auditor, ultimately wrote oﬀ the receivable in the
third and fourth quarters of 2018 as a bad debt expense. Those write-oﬀs were reﬂected in the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the period ended September 30, 2018 and Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018. However, in
light of the information currently available to the Company, the Company has determined that no revenue should have been recognized in
2017 or 2018 due to the customer disputing the shipment and refusing to pay the amount owed and therefore the transaction did not meet
all of the revenue recognition criteria under ASC 606, which the Company adopted on January 1, 2018. The Company is continuing collection
eﬀorts to recover payment from its customer, and it instituted a lawsuit against the customer in February 2020 to recover payment, which
is ongoing. Due to uncertainties inherent in litigation, the Company cannot predict the outcome of this action.
   
During the process of restating its ﬁnancial statements due to the transactions mentioned above, other adjustments were noted and related
to inventory valuation, loss on settlement of debt and equity transactions along adjustments to accruals based on factors known at the
time of this ﬁling versus what was known as of the original ﬁling date.
  
Please see also “Controls and Procedures” under Item 9A of this report for a discussion of material weaknesses in our internal controls over
ﬁnancial reporting which existed as of December 31, 2019.
  
 
2
 
 
PART I
 
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
 
Company Overview
 
United Health Products, Inc. (“UHP” or the “Company”) develops, manufactures, and markets a patented hemostatic gauze for the
healthcare and wound care sectors. The product, HemoStyp®, is derived from all natural, regenerated oxidized cellulose and designed to
absorb exudate/drainage from superﬁcial wounds and help control bleeding. We currently have limited sales of products aimed at the
consumer market via Walmart.com. We are in the process of seeking regulatory approval to sell products into the U.S. Class III surgical
market.
 
Recent Developments
 
The following developments in the Company’s business have occurred during 2019:
 
 •In August 2019, the Company ﬁled a patent application covering methods of forming and using a hemostatic material, and more
speciﬁcally, methods of forming and using a hemostatic hydrocolloid that is formed into a gel, foam or spray used to control
bleeding and oozing from a variety of wounds. The approval of the new patent would allow for the HemoStyp hydrocolloid to act
as a conduit to transfer other properties associated with the treatment of wounds within the hydrocolloid. This would enable
HemoStyp to be bundled as a suite of multiple products for surgical and wound care applications. We cannot assure that our
patent application will be granted.
    
   In August 2019, the Company successfully completed the surgeries for its Human Trial study “Eﬃcacy and Safety of HemoStyp
as an Adjunct for Management of Secondary Hemostasis in the Operative Setting” which ﬁnalized human trial enrollment
    
 •Furthermore, in August 2019, the Company received the pathology results of a preclinical animal study to assess the eﬀect of
HemoStyp on bone tissue. The Company conducted the animal study to evaluate the suitability of HemoStyp in contact with
bone in the chronic swine model, and to validate HemoStyp for this application. This study and indication are independent of the
current PMA application and will potentially allow UHP to access new and signiﬁcant market opportunities. The study results
determined that there was no adverse pH eﬀect on the bone and surrounding tissue, which UHP believes demonstrate the
potential for safe application of HemoStyp in human orthopedic procedures. The Company is using this study as part of its
indication request in its current PMA application.
     
 •Also, in October 2019 the Company received a ﬁnal report by an independent reviewer of the result of its Human Trial study,
conﬁrming the non-inferiority and superiority of HemoStyp over Surgicel ORIGINAL, the market leader for hemostatic agents.
This report was integrated into the Company’s Class III PMA submission for FDA approval
 
Our HemoStyp Gauze Products
 
HemoStyp Hemostatic Gauze is a collagen-like natural substance created from chemically treated cellulose. It is an eﬀective hemostatic
agent registered with the FDA to help control bleeding from open wounds and body cavities. The HemoStyp hemostatic material contains
no chemical additives, thrombin or collagen, and is hypoallergenic. When the product comes in contact with blood it expands slightly and
converts to an adhesive gel that subsequently dissolves into glucose and saline. Because of its purity and the fact that it simply degrades
to non-toxic end products, HemoStyp does not cause signiﬁcant delay in healing as do certain other hemostatic materials. Additional
testing has shown HemoStyp to be 100% absorbable in 24 hours or less. Tests have also been conducted to demonstrate the eﬀectiveness
of HemoStyp in thoracic and abdominal procedures.
 
HemoStyp Hemostatic Gauze is a ﬂexible cloth-like material that is applied by folding the gauze as needed to ﬁt the size of the wound or
incision, and then placing the gauze onto the bleeding tissue. In surgical situations, the product converts to a transparent gel with a neutral
pH level that allows the surgeon to monitor the coagulation process and also avoids damage to the surrounding tissue. In ﬁrst responder or
other non-surgical situations, putting a bandage on top of the gauze is optional and, in many cases, unnecessary. Since EMS (Emergency
Medical Services) work is pre-hospital, rinsing the gauze out with saline or water is not necessary, as a wound will be debrided and possibly
reopened prior to suturing at the hospital.
 
 
3
 
 
Potential Target Markets
 
Our technology can be marketed as HemoStyp Gauze in various conﬁgurations and sizes both nationally and internationally. Our potential
customer base for our HemoStyp includes, without limitation, the following (noting that we have several formats of Trauma Gauze):
 
•Hospitals and Surgery Centers for all Internal Surgical usage, post FDA Class III approval
 •Hospitals, Clinics and Physicians – For external trauma
•EMS, Fire Departments and Other First Responders
•Public Safety, Police Departments and Military
•Correctional Facilities
•Schools, Universities and Day Care Facilities
•Nursing Homes and Assisted Living Environments
•Home Care Providers
•Dental oﬃces for oral surgery
•Sports Medicine Providers
•Veterinarians
•Municipalities and Government Agencies
•Occupational and Industrial Healthcare Professionals
 • Consumers
 • Island dressings to support intravenous procedures such as kidney dialysis
 
Primary Strategy
 
In 2018, management made the decision that rather than focusing on immediate sales activities of our products in targeted markets
during this period of time before receiving anticipated FDA approval for Class III surgical markets, the Company would refocus eﬀorts to
become a stronger, medical technology company with a patented technology for Class III surgical markets that would enhance the
Company’s value and overall market strength. The FDA approval process requires substantial amount of the Company’s resources and
energy so the focus was removed from sales and marketing and full attention was focused on the FDA process and seeking an
acquisition/commercial partner candidate. Thus we made a determination not to engage new distribution partners while pursuing this
strategy as that could create conﬂicts and limit or preclude opportunities with a potential acquiror/commercial candidate and tie the
Company’s hands from a revenue or branding perspective. The Class III surgical markets, both domestic and international, represent the
most attractive market for our products due to the limited competition from other Class III approved ORC (Oxidized Regenerated Cellulose)
products and the resulting premium pricing for hemostatic agents that can meet the demanding requirements of the human surgical
environment. In addition, our preliminary tests and our completed Human Trial study, leads us to believe that the HemoStyp technology can
compete against established market participants and allow us to gain market share. Given this assessment, we have devoted considerable
resources since 2018 to completing the FDA process and gaining access to this market in the U.S. As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the
FDA review process, which was temporarily held up by the Covid-19 virus pandemic, is ongoing.
 
 
4
 
  
In anticipation of receiving Class III approval, we are evaluating the best paths to rapidly grow our revenue and proﬁts in all potential
market segments, which could include seeking (i) a potential sale or merger, which may include a pre-sale commercialization component,
(ii) one or more commercial partnerships and licensing agreements with established market participants, without there being a sale or
merger, or (iii) to raise the necessary capital to establish and grow our own marketing and distribution capabilities via organic growth.
  
The Company has been contacted by several medical technology companies that are active in the surgical equipment and
hemostatic products sectors, and who have expressed an interest in the Company’s products and business strategy. In response to these
inbound contacts, and to maximize shareholder value, the Company’s board of directors has determined to conduct a review of strategic
alternatives, which include, without limitation, identifying an acquisition candidate, joint ventures or other commercial partnerships, or a
standalone growth plan. To assist in this review and strategy, the Company is working with a ﬁnancial advisory ﬁrm. There can be no
assurances that any speciﬁc transaction will occur as a result of the retention of this ﬁrm. No assurances can be given that the Company
will identify an acquisition or commercialization candidate(s) or complete a transaction with one or more candidates on terms satisfactory
to us, if at all.
 
Manufacturing and Packaging of our Products
 
The Company’s cellulose products are manufactured in the United States to our speciﬁcations at various facilities. We have
established various contract manufacturing facilities. All of these facilities have been carefully vetted and have supplied multiple Quality
Control program certiﬁcates and are registered FDA facilities. These facilities have been submitted as part of our PMA submission, which
includes the FDA inspection records of these facilities.
 
Patents and Trademarks
 
The Company’s hemostatic gauze products are patented in the U.S. Patent and Trademark Oﬃce (“USPTO”), which patent protection
currently runs through 2029. However, if our intellectual property positions are challenged, invalidated, circumvented, or expire, or if we fail
to prevail in future intellectual property litigation, our business could be adversely aﬀected. We have created multiple variations of our
gauze product and will protect each of these new generation platforms and product with additional intellectual property. Our success
depends in part on our ability to defend our intellectual property rights. The patent positions of pharmaceutical and biotechnology
companies can be highly uncertain and often involve complex legal, scientiﬁc, and factual questions. Third parties may seek to challenge,
invalidate, or circumvent our intellectual property rights. In addition, our patent positions might not protect us against competitors with
similar products or technologies because competing products or technologies may not infringe our patents. Also, there are third parties who
have patents or pending patent applications that they may claim necessitate payment of a royalty or prevent us from commercializing our
patent in certain territories. Patent disputes are frequent, costly and can preclude, delay, or increase the cost of commercialization of
products.
 
During 2019, the Company received trademarks for the following::
 
  · Boo Boo Strips:
    
  · The Ultimate Bandage
    
  · Hemostrips
    
  · Nik Fix
 
 
5
 
  
Competition
 
The disposable medical supply market in the United States is dominated by large companies such as Baxter International, Bristol-
Myers Squibb Company, Johnson & Johnson and 3M Company, each of which have far greater capital and operational resources than us. Our
hemostatic gauze product will directly compete in the gauze markets dominated by these majors. However, the market for hemostatic
products, which includes gauzes, gels, bandages and powders, is largely composed of smaller, privately-held companies with the exception
of Johnson & Johnson, which manufactures Surgicel. In this market, competitive factors include price, product oﬀerings, value-added service
programs, service and delivery, credit terms, and customer support.
 
Government Regulation
 
We are subject to oversight by various federal and state governmental entities and we are subject to, and aﬀected by, a variety of
federal and state laws, regulations and policies applicable to the healthcare and medical device industries.
 
Environmental Matters
 
The Company may subject to, or aﬀected by, environmental legislation including, among others, the Toxic Substances Control Act,
the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act, Compensation and Liability Act (aka CERCLA or Superfund) and the Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act. By no means do we certify this list as being complete, as there are many laws and regulations that exist or that may come to
pass that we cannot foresee that may also have an impact on the Company. Compliance with the multitude of regulations issued by
federal, state, provincial and local administrative agencies that may apply to the Company can be burdensome and costly.
 
Research and Development Expenditures
 
In the years ending December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 we incurred $666,388, $76,951 and $19,936, respectively, in research and
development expenditures.
 
Personnel
 
As of June 29, 2020, we have ﬁve full-time employees and up to eight additional consultants, excluding our ﬁve Medical Advisory
Board members.
  
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
 
We are engaged in the sale and distribution of hemostatic gauze products to stop superﬁcial bleeding. As we develop our business, there
are numerous and varied risks, known and unknown, that may prevent us from achieving our goals. If any of these risks actually occur, our
business, ﬁnancial condition or results of operation may be materially adversely aﬀected. In such case, the trading price of our common
stock could decline, and investors could lose all or part of their investment.
 
Impacts of COVID-19 to Business and the General Economy
  
Covid -19 has recently caused a material and substantial adverse impact on our general economy. It has also caused there to be a
temporary hold on our FDA application for class III approval of our HemoStyp product for internal surgical purposes while the FDA deals with
the Covid-19 crisis which has delayed the process. Recently, this hold was lifted by the FDA.
 
 
6
 
  
The impacts of the global emergence of Coronavirus disease (COVID-19) on our business and the general economy, are currently not fully
known. We are conducting business as usual with some modiﬁcations to, employee work locations, among other modiﬁcations We have
observed other companies taking precautionary and preemptive actions to address COVID-19 and companies may take further actions that
alter their normal business operations. We will continue to actively monitor the situation and may take further actions that alter our
business operations as may be required by federal, state or local authorities or that we determine are in the best interests of our
employees, potential partners, suppliers and stockholders. It is not clear what the potential eﬀects any such alterations or modiﬁcations
may have on our business, including the eﬀects on our prospects, although we do anticipate it to negatively impact our ﬁnancial results and
the length of time needed to obtain FDA approval of our HemoStyp product for internal surgical purposes during ﬁscal year 2020.
 
Risks Related to Our Restatement and Internal Controls
 
We have identiﬁed various material weaknesses in our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting which have materially
adversely aﬀected our ability to timely and accurately report our results of operations and ﬁnancial condition. These
material weaknesses may not have been fully remediated as of the ﬁling date of this report and we cannot assure you that
other material weaknesses will not be identiﬁed in the future.
 
As a result of the circumstances which gave rise to our restatements discussed under “Explanatory Note” and in our Comprehensive
Form 10-K, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer have concluded that, as of December 31, 2019, we had material
weaknesses in our internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting and that, as a result, our disclosure controls and procedures and our internal
controls over ﬁnancial reporting were not eﬀective at such date. A material weakness is a deﬁciency, or combination of deﬁciencies, in
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting that creates a reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of our annual or interim ﬁnancial
statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely basis.
 
In addition, we believe that we continued to have material weaknesses in our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting subsequent to
December 31, 2019. See “Controls and Procedures” under Item 9A for a detailed discussion of the material weaknesses identiﬁed as of
December 31, 2019 and possible material weaknesses as of subsequent periods. Although we are in the process of implementing remedial
measures to address all of the identiﬁed material weaknesses, our assessment of the impact of these measures has not been completed
as of the ﬁling date of this report, and we cannot assure you that these measures will be adequate. Moreover, we cannot assure you that
additional material weaknesses in our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting will not arise or be identiﬁed in the future.
 
As a result, we must continue to improve our operational, information technology, and ﬁnancial systems, infrastructure, procedures,
and controls, as well as continue to expand, train, retain, and manage our employee base. Any failure to do so, or any diﬃculties we
encounter during implementation, could result in additional material weaknesses or in material misstatements in our ﬁnancial statements.
These misstatements could result in a future restatement of our ﬁnancial statements, could cause us to fail to meet our reporting
obligations, or could cause investors to lose conﬁdence in our reported ﬁnancial information, leading to a decline in our stock price.
 
The extraordinary processes underlying the preparation of the ﬁnancial statements contained in this report may not have
been adequate and our ﬁnancial statements remain subject to the risk of future restatement.
 
The completion of our audits for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the restatement of certain items and the making of
other corrective adjustments to our ﬁnancial statements for the last three years, and the revenue recognition review undertaken in
connection therewith, involved a comprehensive review and analysis of our contracts and business practices, and other accounting rules
and pronouncements. Given the complexity and scope of these exercises, and notwithstanding the extensive time, eﬀort, and expense that
went into them, we cannot assure you that these processes were adequate or that additional accounting errors will not come to light in the
future in these or other areas.
 
If additional accounting errors come to light in areas reviewed as part of our extraordinary processes or otherwise, or if ongoing
interpretations of applicable accounting rules and pronouncements result in unanticipated changes in our accounting practices or ﬁnancial
reporting, future restatements of our ﬁnancial statements may be required.
 
 
7
 
  
We cannot assure that our regular ﬁnancial statement preparation and reporting processes are or will be adequate or that
future restatements will not be required.
 
As discussed in the preceding risk factor, the processes underlying the preparation of the ﬁnancial statements contained in this report were
extraordinary. During the current year ending December 31, 2020, we expect to increasingly rely on our regular ﬁnancial statement
preparation and reporting processes.
 
While we are in the process of changing and enhancing our processes (as described elsewhere in this report) as of the ﬁling date of this
report, we cannot assure you that previously identiﬁed material weaknesses have been fully remediated and we continue to:
 
  • make changes to our ﬁnance organization;
     
  • adopt new accounting and reporting processes and procedures;
     
  • enhance our revenue recognition and other existing accounting policies and procedures;
     
  • introduce new or enhanced accounting systems and processes; and
     
  • improve our internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting.
 
Many of these changes and enhancements to our regular processes are ongoing as of the ﬁling date of this report and we continue to
assimilate the changes we have already made. We cannot assure you that the changes and enhancements made to date, or those that are
still in process, are adequate, will operate as expected, or will be completed in a timely fashion (if still in process). As a result, we cannot
assure you that we will not discover additional errors, that future ﬁnancial reports will not contain material misstatements or omissions,
that future restatements will not be required, that we will be able to timely complete our remaining SEC ﬁlings for periods subsequent to
this report, or that we will be able to timely comply with our reporting obligations in the future.
 
RISKS RELATED TO OUR BUSINESS
 
We have a history of operating losses and we may continue to lose money in the future
 
For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the Company had a net loss of $6,602,295, $5,402,369 and $1,466,789,
respectively. We may continue to lose money in the future.
 
We can provide no assurances that given that the Class III application for internal surgical procedures will be approved by
the FDA.
 
In November 2019, the Company submitted to the FDA all materials relevant for the pre-market approval (“PMA”) for HemoStyp as a
Class III application for internal surgical procedures. There can be no assurances given that the Class III application for internal surgical
procedures will be approved by the FDA.
 
 
8
 
  
We have refocused our business activities to seek to obtain FDA approval of our products for Class III surgical markets., of
which there can be no assurances given. Further, no assurances can be given that our Management plans to attempt to
penetrate all market segments will be successful.
 
We believe that rather than focusing on immediate sales activities of our products in targeted markets during this period of time
before receiving anticipated FDA approval for Class III surgical markets, that refocusing the Company to become a stronger, medical
technology corporation with a patented technology for Class III surgical markets is a preferable strategy to enhance the Company’s value
and overall market strength. In this regard, the Class III surgical markets, both domestic and international, represent the most attractive
market for our products due to the limited competition from other Class III approved ORC (Oxidized Regenerated Cellulose) products and
the resulting premium pricing for hemostatic agents that can meet the demanding requirements of the human surgical environment. As of
the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the FDA review process, which was temporarily held up by the Covid-19 virus pandemic, is ongoing. In the
event we receive Class III approval, the success of which cannot be assured, we are evaluating the best paths to attempt to rapidly grow
our revenue and proﬁts in all potential market segments, which could include one or more commercial partnerships and licensing
agreements with established market participants or an acquisition/merger agreement with any such participants, each as an alternative to
raising the necessary capital to establish and grow our own marketing and distribution capabilities via organic growth. We will carefully
evaluate the returns on investment to create shareholder value of each of these strategies. No assurances can be given that our
Management plans to attempt to penetrate all market segments or be acquired/merged with an established market participant will be
successful on terms satisfactory to us, if at all.
 
Our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm has expressed substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going
concern. This could make it more diﬃcult for us to raise funds and adversely aﬀect our relationships with lenders,
investors and suppliers.
 
Our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm has expressed doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. This
indicates that our auditors believe that substantial doubt exists regarding our ability to continue to remain in business. We cannot provide
any assurance that we will in fact operate our business proﬁtably or obtain suﬃcient ﬁnancing to sustain our business in the event we are
not successful in our eﬀorts to generate suﬃcient revenue and operating cash ﬂow. The expression of such doubt by our independent
registered public accounting ﬁrm or our inability to overcome the factors leading to such doubt could have a material adverse eﬀect on our
relationships with prospective customers, lenders, investors and suppliers, and therefore could have a material adverse eﬀect on our
business.
 
We can provide no assurances that the retention of a ﬁnancial advisor to assist in strategic review will result in the
occurrence of a speciﬁc transaction.
 
The Company has been contacted by several medical technology companies that are active in the surgical equipment and
hemostatic products sectors, and who have expressed an interest in the Company’s products and business strategy. In response to these
inbound contacts, and to maximize shareholder value, the Company’s board of directors has determined to conduct a review of strategic
alternatives, which include, without limitation, identifying an acquisition candidate, joint ventures or other commercial partnerships, or a
standalone growth plan. To assist in this review, the Company is working with a ﬁnancial advisory ﬁrm. There can be no assurances that
any speciﬁc transaction will occur as a result of the retention of this ﬁrm. No assurances can be given that the Company will identify an
acquisition or commercialization candidate(s) or complete a transaction with one or more candidates on terms satisfactory to us, if at all.
 
 
9
 
  
We will need additional ﬁnancing to execute our business plan and fund operations, which additional ﬁnancing may not be
available.
 
We currently have a working capital deﬁcit, minimal cash and limited sales of our products. Our Chief Executive Oﬃcer has in the
past provided cash loans to us which are repayable upon demand to meet our working capital needs. These cash loans can be terminated
at any time. As result of the Company’s ﬁnancial position, we may not be able to execute our current business plan and fund business
operations long enough to achieve proﬁtability. Our ultimate success may depend upon our ability to raise additional capital. There can be
no assurance that additional funds will be available when needed from any source or, if available, will be available on terms that are
acceptable to us.
 
We may be required to pursue sources of additional capital through various means, including joint venture projects and debt or
equity ﬁnancings. Future ﬁnancings through equity investments are likely to be dilutive to existing stockholders. Also, the terms of
securities we may issue in future capital transactions may be more favorable for our new investors. Newly issued securities may include
preferences, superior voting rights, the issuance of warrants or other derivative securities, and the issuances of incentive awards under
equity employee incentive plans, which may have additional dilutive eﬀects. Further, we may incur substantial costs in pursuing future
capital and/or ﬁnancing, including investment banking fees, legal fees, accounting fees, printing and distribution expenses and other costs.
We may also be required to recognize non-cash expenses in connection with certain securities we may issue, such as convertible notes and
warrants, which will adversely impact our ﬁnancial condition.
 
Our ability to obtain needed ﬁnancing may be impaired by such factors as the capital markets, both generally and speciﬁcally in the
healthcare industry; the fact that we are not proﬁtable, which could impact the availability and cost of future ﬁnancings; and whether we
would be able to obtain capital from investors or funding sources at all due to adverse economic conditions arising as a result of the COVID-
19 pandemic. If the amount of capital we are able to raise from ﬁnancing activities, together with our revenues from operations, is not
suﬃcient to satisfy our capital needs, even to the extent that we reduce our operations accordingly, we may be required to cease
operations.
 
No guarantee of market acceptance.
 
Our success is dependent on market acceptance of our hemostatic gauze products. We cannot assure you that healthcare market
professionals will conclude that our hemostatic gauze products are useful and/or safe. We cannot assure you that our hemostatic gauze
products will ultimately achieve or maintain signiﬁcant market acceptance among distributors, patients, physicians, or healthcare payers in
general.
 
We are dependent upon strategic relationships to conduct our operations and implement our plans.
 
To market and sell our hemostatic gauze products business, we will endeavor to use the business relationships of our management
to enter into strategic relationships, which may take the form of joint ventures with private parties and contractual arrangements with other
resource companies, to implement our strategies. We currently do not have any strategic relationships. We may not be able to establish
these strategic relationships, or if established, we may not be able to maintain them. In addition, the dynamics of our relationships with
strategic partners may require us to incur expenses or undertake activities we would not otherwise be inclined to in order to fulﬁll our
obligations to these partners or maintain our relationships. If our strategic relationships are not established or maintained, our business
prospects may be limited, which could diminish our ability to conduct our operations. We can provide no assurances that distribution
agreements will be entered into on terms satisfactory to us, if at all or that our operations will be proﬁtable as a result of these distribution
agreements.
 
We could experience diﬃculties in our supply chain.
 
The Company’s cellulose products are manufactured in the United States to our speciﬁcations at various facilities. We have
established various contract manufacturing facilities. All of these facilities have been carefully vetted and have supplied multiple Quality
Control program certiﬁcates and are registered FDA facilities. These facilities have been submitted as part of our PMA submission, which
includes the FDA inspection records of these facilities.
 
Our contract manufacturers and packaging facilities are responsible for quality control and overseeing the packaging and labeling of
our products for distribution. We rely upon the services of our contract manufacturer to perform its obligations in a satisfactory manner and
we could experience diﬃculties in our supply chain.
 
 
10
 
  
We are currently dependent on one hemostatic gauze product line to generate income.
 
The Company’s hemostatic gauze product line is currently our only product line from which we can derive revenue. Unless we are
able to implement one of the other strategies discussed in the report, the lack of success in developing a commercial market for this
product line will materially adversely aﬀect our operations.
 
Our business may suﬀer if we do not attract and retain talented personnel.
 
Our success will depend in large measure on the abilities, expertise, judgment, discretion, integrity and good faith of our
management and other personnel in conducting our intended business. In addition, we depend on management and employees to interpret
market data correctly and to interpret and respond to economic, market and other conditions to locate and adopt appropriate business
opportunities. We presently have a small management team, which we intend to expand in conjunction with our planned operations and
growth. We will have to ensure that management and any key employees are appropriately compensated; however, their services cannot
be guaranteed. If we are unable to attract and retain additional key management personnel and enter into satisfactory employment and
other agreements, our business may be adversely aﬀected.
 
We may not be able to adequately protect our technologies or intellectual property rights.
 
Our ability to achieve commercial or strategic success will depend in part on maintaining patent protection and trade secret
protection of our technologies as well as successfully defending our intellectual property against third-party challenges. We will only be
able to protect our technologies from unauthorized use by third parties to the extent that valid and enforceable patents or trade secrets
cover them. Furthermore, the degree of future protection of our proprietary rights is uncertain because legal means aﬀord only limited
protection and may not adequately protect our rights or permit us to gain or keep our competitive advantage. Additionally, legal
enforcement of intellectual property rights is costly and we may not have the ﬁnancial resources to take the necessary legal action to
protect our rights.
 
RISKS RELATED TO OUR INDUSTRY
 
The healthcare industry is subject to extensive government regulation, which can result in increased costs, delays, limits
on its operating ﬂexibility and competitive disadvantages.
 
The healthcare industry is generally subject to extensive regulatory requirements. Many of these requirements result in signiﬁcant
costs that may adversely aﬀect our business and ﬁnancial results. If we are unable to pass those costs on it would negatively impact our
proﬁt margin.
 
Healthcare insurance legislation may lead to unintended adverse eﬀects for businesses involved in our industry. New legislation that
gives the Federal government greater regulatory powers may lead to negative consequences for certain aspects of our business. The full
scope of the recently passed healthcare legislation may not be felt for several years, it is therefore diﬃcult to predict any future
consequences that would be challenges to our Company, or if we can overcome them.
 
 
11
 
  
Failure to comply with laws or government regulations could result in penalties.
 
Certain government requirements for technologies in the healthcare market may require licensure or mandatory minimum standards
relating to the provision of services. Failure to comply with these requirements could materially aﬀect our ability to expand into new or
existing markets. Future regulatory developments may also cause disruptions to our operations.
 
RISKS RELATING TO OUR ORGANIZATION
 
We are subject to the reporting requirements of the federal securities laws, which can be expensive.
 
We are a public reporting company and, accordingly, subject to the information and reporting requirements of the Exchange Act and
other federal and state securities laws, including compliance with the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. The costs of preparing and ﬁling annual
and quarterly reports, proxy statements and other information with the SEC and furnishing audited reports to stockholders increase our
operating costs.
 
It is time consuming, diﬃcult and costly for us to develop and implement the internal controls and reporting procedures required by
the Sarbanes-Oxley Act. We may need to hire additional ﬁnancial reporting, internal controls and other ﬁnance personnel in order to develop
and implement appropriate internal controls and reporting procedures. If we are unable to comply with the internal control’s requirements
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, we may not be able to obtain the independent accountant certiﬁcations required by that Act.
 
Failure to achieve and maintain eﬀective disclosure controls or internal controls could have a material adverse eﬀect on
our ability to report our ﬁnancial results timely and accurately.
 
As result of our analysis of our system of internal accounting controls and accounting and ﬁnancial reporting processes, we have
identiﬁed a material weakness in our disclosure controls and internal controls. These are more speciﬁcally discussed in Item 9A of this
Annual Report. As a result of these deﬁciencies, we must perform additional analysis and other post-closing procedures to ensure that our
ﬁnancial statements are prepared in accordance with US generally accepted accounting principles. As a result, we will incur expenses and
devote signiﬁcant management resources to this review process. Furthermore, eﬀective internal controls and procedures are necessary for
us to continue to provide reliable ﬁnancial reports. If we continue to have material weaknesses in our internal controls and procedures, we
may not be able to provide reliable ﬁnancial reports and our business and operating results could be harmed.
 
Public company compliance requirements may make it more diﬃcult to attract and retain oﬃcers and directors.
 
The Sarbanes-Oxley Act and rules subsequently implemented by the SEC have required changes in corporate governance practices
of public companies. Compliance with the new rules and regulations increases our operating costs and makes certain activities more time
consuming and costly than if we were not a public company. As a public company, these new rules and regulations make it more diﬃcult
and expensive for us to obtain director and oﬃcer liability insurance. As a result, it may be more diﬃcult for us to attract and retain
qualiﬁed persons to serve on our Board of Directors or as executive oﬃcers.
 
There exist risks to stockholders relating to dilution: authorization of additional securities and reduction of percentage
share ownership following investment.
 
To the extent that additional shares of common stock are issued, the stockholders would experience dilution of their respective
ownership interests in the Company. Additionally, if the Company issues a substantial number of shares of common stock in connection
with or following an investment, a change in control of the Company may occur which may aﬀect, among other things, the Company’s
ability to utilize net operating loss carry forwards, if any. Furthermore, the issuance of a substantial number of shares of common stock
may adversely aﬀect prevailing market prices, if any, for the common stock and could impair the Company’s ability to raise additional
capital through the sale of its equity securities. The Company may use consultants and other third parties providing goods and services or
additional capital. These consultants or third parties may be paid in cash, stock, options or other securities of the Company, and the
consultants or third parties may be Placement Agents or their aﬃliates.
 
 
12
 
  
RISKS RELATING TO OUR COMMON STOCK
 
Our stock price may be volatile.
 
The market price of our common stock is likely to be highly volatile and could ﬂuctuate widely in price in response to various
factors, many of which are beyond our control, including the following:
 
•changes in the healthcare industry;
•competitive pricing pressures;
•our ability to obtain working capital ﬁnancing;
•additions or departures of key personnel;
•limited “public ﬂoat”, in the hands of a small number of persons whose sales or lack of sales, could result in positive or negative
pricing pressure on the market price for our common stock;
•our ability to execute our business plan;
•operating results that fall below expectations;
•loss of any strategic relationship;
•regulatory developments;
•economic and other external factors, including among others, eﬀects on the markets stemming from the COVID-19 pandemic;
and
•period-to-period ﬂuctuations in our ﬁnancial results.
 
In addition, the securities markets have from time to time experienced signiﬁcant price and volume ﬂuctuations that are unrelated
to the operating performance of particular companies. These market ﬂuctuations may also materially and adversely aﬀect the market price
of our common stock.
 
We have not paid dividends in the past and do not expect to pay dividends in the future. Any return on investment may be
limited to the value of our common stock.
 
We have never paid cash dividends on our common stock and do not anticipate doing so in the foreseeable future. The payment of
cash dividends on our common stock will depend on earnings, ﬁnancial condition and other business and economic factors aﬀecting us at
such time as our board of directors may consider relevant. If we do not pay dividends, our common stock may be less valuable because a
return on investment will only occur if our stock price appreciates.
 
There is currently established market for our common stock, and we cannot ensure that one will ever develop or be
sustained.
 
The Company’s common stock is available for trading on the OTC Pink. Management considers the market for our common stock to
be limited. We can provide no assurances that an established trading market for our common stock will exist in the future.
 
 
13
 
  
Our common stock is deemed a “penny stock”, which may make it more diﬃcult for our investors to sell their shares.
 
Our common stock is subject to the “penny stock” rules adopted under Section 15(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The
penny stock rules apply to companies whose common stock is not listed on a national securities exchange and trades at less than $5.00
per share or that have tangible net worth of less than $5,000,000 ($2,000,000 if the company has been operating for three or more years).
These rules require, among other things, that brokers who trade penny stock to persons other than “established customers” complete
certain documentation, make suitability inquiries of investors and provide investors with certain information concerning trading in the
security, including a risk disclosure document and quote information under certain circumstances. Many brokers have decided not to trade
penny stocks because of the requirements of the penny stock rules and, as a result, the number of broker-dealers willing to act as market
makers in such securities is limited. If we remain subject to the penny stock rules for any signiﬁcant period, it could have an adverse eﬀect
on the market, if any, for our securities. In as much as our securities are subject to the penny stock rules, investors will ﬁnd it more diﬃcult
to dispose of our securities.
 
Oﬀers or availability for sale of a substantial number of shares of our common stock may cause the price of our common
stock to decline.
 
If our stockholders sell substantial amounts of our common stock in the public market, or upon the expiration of any holding period
under Rule 144, or expiration of lock-up periods applicable to outstanding shares, or issued upon the exercise of outstanding options or
warrants, it could create a circumstance commonly referred to as an “overhang” and in anticipation of which the market price of our
common stock could fall. The existence of an overhang, whether or not sales have occurred or are occurring, also could make more diﬃcult
our ability to raise additional ﬁnancing through the sale of equity or equity-related securities in the future at a time and price that we deem
reasonable or appropriate.
 
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
 
None
 
ITEM 2. DESCRIPTION OF PROPERTY
 
The Company is utilizing on a temporary basis rent free, as a central mailing address as its principal executive oﬃce, space located
at 10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209, Henderson, NV 89052. Conference facilities are available upon request at a fee. The Company is a
virtual company with personnel in Nevada and six other states.
 
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
 
The following material legal proceedings are pending against us:
 
A Complaint was ﬁled with the United States District Court, Southern District of New York by Steven Safran as Plaintiﬀ against the
Company and Douglas Beplate, its CEO, as Defendant. This court case was transferred to the United States District Court in Las Vegas,
Nevada. Mr. Safran is seeking damages and monies allegedly owed pursuant to an employment agreement of approximately $734,000 and
allegedly unpaid loans of $245,824 provided to Defendants. The Company has denied Plaintiﬀ’s allegations and intends to vigorously
defend said lawsuit. The parties have held various depositions and the Company had a motion to dismiss which was denied. The Plaintiﬀ
ﬁled a motion to amend his complaint and the Company has submitted opposition papers and are awaiting an order from the Court.
   
In July 2015, the Company entered into a consulting agreement retaining the services of Maxim Group LLC. An amended agreement
was executed in January 2018. A total of 4 million shares of common stock were issued to Maxim in exchange for its obligation to perform
certain advisory and other services. In the fourth quarter of 2018, the Company notiﬁed Maxim of its intent to ﬁle for arbitration pursuant to
the consulting agreement. Maxim, without providing a similar notice to the Company, immediately ﬁled a complaint with FINRA seeking
release of a restrictive legend from a Company stock certiﬁcate in the amount of 500,000 shares. The Company ﬁled an aﬃrmative defense
that the required notice of arbitration was not provided to the Company prior to ﬁling. The Company also ﬁled a counterclaim for breach of
contract seeking restitution of the original 4 million shares issued to Maxim. This case was settled on December 13, 2019, with Maxim
agreeing to make certain payments to the Company post sale of their 500,000 Company shares, in an amount equal to one-half of their
sales proceeds. To date, the Company has not received any payments.
 
 
14
 
 
During 2018, a vendor ﬁled a judgement against the Company related to disputed invoices.  The Company paid $15,000 to settle the
judgement in full during the year ended December 31, 2018.
 
Philip Forman, who served in positions as Chairman, a director, Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical Advisor at various time
between 2011 and October 2015, ﬁled a lawsuit against the Company and our Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in the United States
District Court of the District of Nevada. The claimant is claiming, among other things, that: the June 25, 2015 Amendment to his November
10, 2014 Employment Agreement with the Company, which terminated the Employment Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not valid
because of lack of consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the claimant sold Company shares
issued to him under the Amendment to a third a party is unenforceable (despite the fact that all payment for the shares under the Stock
Purchase Agreement was made); that the plaintiﬀ’s 2014 Employment Agreement is enforceable and that he is entitled to cash and stock
compensation under that Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment); that if the Amendment is enforceable, he is
entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that those shares were sold to a third party under the Stock Purchase
Agreement described above); and that the Company and Mr. Beplate defrauded the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking
declaratory judgment regarding the parties’ relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase
Agreement; money damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The Company believes that it has
meritorious defenses to the matters claimed as well as counterclaims against the claimant. A motion to dismiss the plaintiﬀ’s claims was
ﬁled and on March 19, 2020 the motion to dismiss was denied. Discovery is now taking place.
 
FSR Inc. commenced a lawsuit in 2018 against Korsair Holdings A.G. in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York,
seeking among other claims for relief, rescission of the transfer of 3,050,000 shares of United Health Products that FSR sold to Korsair in
2011. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ, JEC Consulting Associates, LLC as Liquidator of LeadDog Capital L.P., Intervenor (“Intervenor”) in the above
matter, ﬁled a third-party complaint against United Health Products, and Douglas Beplate alleging among other things that the Company
and Mr. Beplate refused to have the Rule 144 restrictive legend removed from the Korsair certiﬁcate held by JEC, and concomitantly
fraudulently deprive JEC as Liquidator of LeadDog of the ability to sell the Shares in the open market, knowingly, intentionally and directly
causing economic harm to LeadDog Capital L.P. Intervenor as Third Party Plaintiﬀ further alleges that the Company and Mr. Beplate as Third-
Party Defendants are not only monetarily liable to Third-Party Plaintiﬀ for compensatory damages of $2,500,000 but should be made to pay
exemplary damages in an amount determined by the Court, but not less than an equal amount - $2,500,000. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ demands
judgment for the above referenced amounts and for the Court to also declare that the 3,050,000 shares are free trading; that Third-Party
Plaintiﬀ’s rights to 2.5 million of the Shares are superior to the claims of Plaintiﬀ FSR; that Plaintiﬀ FSR has no claim to 2.5 million of the
3,050,000 Shares reﬂected by the Korsair certiﬁcate; that the Company and Mr. Beplate are to instruct its current transfer agent to remove
the restrictive legend on the Korsair certiﬁcate for the Shares; and an order directing the Company and Mr. Beplate to instruct the
Company’s transfer agent to exchange the Korsair certiﬁcate for new free-trading, unrestricted certiﬁcates. The Company believes that it
had legal right to decline to instruct the transfer agent to remove the restrictive legend from the Korsair Shares where the ownership of the
aforementioned shares have been in dispute and the Korsair shares have not been submitted for transfer to its transfer agent in proper
form under the uniform commercial code. Recently, the Court granted the motion for a default by FSR, Inc against Korsair Holdings, AG., but
denied any claim for relief against UHP, Inc. The Court ruled that the SEC must review the claim before the matter can proceed in Court.
 
In 2019 the Company commenced the following legal proceeding:
 
In October 2019 the Company ﬁled a defamation, trade libel and unlawful and deceptive practices lawsuit against White Diamond
Research LLC, Adam Gefvert, Streetsweeper.org, Sonya Colberg and others in response to a stock manipulation scheme to injure UHP for
illegitimate personal gain. The complaint alleged that in August 2019 the above defendants published false and defamatory statements
about UHP in “short and distort” schemes to artiﬁcially drive down the market price of UHP’s common stock while at the same time having
a short position in UHP’s stock, so they could obtain illicit proﬁts on their short sale positions. This lawsuit was settled in April 2020 on
terms mutually agreed to by the Company and the defendant parties, without the exchange of monetary payment or other economic
consideration.
 
In 2020 the Company commenced the following legal proceeding:
 
On February 7, 2020, the Company ﬁled the Original Petition for Fraud and Breach of Contract in the 215th Judicial District of Harris
County. The demand for trial by jury was made. Defendants Patterson Companies Inc., and Patterson Management, L.P., were served on
February 24, 2020. Defendants Patterson Veterinary, Inc. and Patterson Logistics Services, Inc. were served on February 25, 2020. Defendant
Animal Health was served on February 27, 2020. On March 5, 2020, the Defendants removed to federal court. The defendants ﬁled their
answer in federal court on March 12, 2020. An “initial pretrial and schedule conference” is set before the Magistrate Judge on August 25,
2020. Discovery is ongoing.
  
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
 
None.
 
 
15
 
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS, AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY
SECURITIES.
 
(a) Market information
 
The common shares of the Company trade on the OTC Pink under the symbol UEEC. There has been only limited trading activity to
date. The following table sets forth the high and low sales price of the common stock on a quarterly basis for the periods presented,
rounded to the nearest penny.
 
    High    Low  
For Year Ended 2019         
First Quarter  $ 1.01  $ 0.64 
Second Quarter  $  0.99  $  0.80 
Third Quarter  $ 2.45  $  0.94 
Fourth Quarter  $  1.48  $  0.97 
            
For Year Ended 2018         
First Quarter  $ 1.49  $ 0.04 
Second Quarter  $  1.02  $  0.75 
Third Quarter  $  0.84  $  0.40 
Fourth Quarter  $  0.69   $ 0.30 
 
(b) Holders
 
As of June 29, 2020, there were approximately 374 holders of record of the Company’s issued and outstanding shares of common
stock.
 
(c) Dividends
 
The Company has not paid any dividends to date, has not yet generated earnings suﬃcient to pay dividends, and currently does not
intend to pay dividends in the foreseeable future.
 
 
16
 
 
(d) Stock Issuances and Repurchases
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the Company issued the following unregistered securities to accredited investors:
 
Date of Sale 
Title of
Security 
Number
Sold  
Consideration Received
and Description of
Underwriting or Other
Discounts to Market Price
or Convertible Security,
Aﬀorded to Purchasers 
Exemption
from
Registration
Claimed 
If Option,
Warrant or
Convertible
Security,
terms of
exercise
or
conversion
Jan – March 31, 2019 Common
Stock2,700,000
shares$75,000 in cash, $2,401,000 in services
rendered, no commissions paid Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable
 
April – September 30, 2019 Common
Stock2,095,769
shares$1,035,750 in cash, $205,000 conversion of
notes payable and accrued liabilities Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable
 
October – December 31,
2019 Common
Stock1,471,430
shares$120,000 in cash, $1,285,250 in services
rendered; No commissions paid Rule 506;
Section 4(2) Not
applicable 
 
During the period January 1, 2019 through December 31, 2019, there were no repurchases of the Company’s unregistered securities.
 
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
 
Not applicable.
 
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATION
 
You should read the following discussion and analysis of our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations together with the section
entitled “Explanatory Note” immediately preceding Item 1 of this Annual Report, ‘‘Selected Financial Data’’ and our ﬁnancial statements
and related notes appearing elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K. This discussion and analysis contain forward-looking statements
that involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. The actual results may diﬀer materially from those anticipated in these forward-looking
statements as a result of certain factors, including, but not limited to, those set forth under ‘Risk Factors’ and elsewhere in this annual
report on Form 10-K.
 
Restatement
 
The accompanying Management’s Discussion and Analysis gives eﬀect to the restatement adjustments made to the previously reported
Financial Statements for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017. For additional information and a detailed discussion of the
restatement, see Note 2, “Restatement” included in this Annual Report under the caption Item 8, “Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data”.
 
It also gives eﬀect to the restatement adjustments made to the previously reported unaudited Financial Statements for the quarterly and
year to date periods ended March 31, 2017, June 30, 2017, September 30, 2017, March 31, 2018, June 30, 2018, September 30, 2018, March
31, 2019, June 30, 2019 and September 30, 2019. For additional information and a detailed discussion of the restatements, see Note 2,
“Restatement” included in this Annual Report under the caption Item 8, “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data”.
 
 
17
 
  
Results of Operations years ending December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
 
The following table sets forth a summary of certain key ﬁnancial information for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017:
 
    For the Years Ended December 31,  
    2019    2018    2017  
      (Restated)  (Restated) 
Revenue  $ 4,927  $ 34,876  $ 183,174 
                 
Gross proﬁt  $ 3,611  $ 12,606  $ 82,185 
                 
Operating (expenses)  $(6,097,723) $(1,909,580) $(1,010,603)
                 
Operating (loss)  $(6,094,112) $(1,896,974) $ (928,418)
                 
Other income (expense)  $ (508,183) $(3,505,395) $ (538,371)
                 
Net (loss)  $(6,602,295) $(5,402,369) $(1,466,789)
                 
Basic and diluted  $ (0.04) $ (0.03) $ (0.01)
  
Year ended December 31, 2019 versus year ended December 31, 2018
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Company had $4,927 and $34,876 of revenues, respectively. The decrease
in revenues is due to the continued focus which commenced in 2018 of substantially all the Company’s energy and resources being
devoted towards making our technology and product more commercially viable, by seeking to obtain FDA class III approval for internal
surgical purposes. The Company is continuing this strategy based on our belief that the greatest value to our shareholders will come from
this FDA Class III approval for general surgical use, and pursuing opportunities that we anticipate will be available to the Company if this
FDA approval is obtained, including, among other things, fostering interest from potential merger and acquisition candidates. In this
strategy and approach, the Company made a determination not to engage new distribution partners as that could create conﬂicts with a
potential acquiror/commercialization candidate and tie the Company’s hands from a revenue or branding perspective. The Company
expects that if an acquisition candidate is identiﬁed it may also include a pre-acquisition commercialization component and in that case
current vendor and future relationships and all pending purchase orders will likely be facilitated by that company. No assurances can be
given that the Company will identify an acquisition or commercialization candidate or complete a transaction with such a candidate on
terms satisfactory to us, if at all.
 
Total operating expenses for the year ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 were $6,097,723 and $1,909,580, respectively. The
increase in operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in consulting/professional fees and an increase in research and development
expenses. The increase in consulting/professional fees include the issuance of 1,925,000 shares of our common stock for services valued at
$1,859,250 and stock based modiﬁcation expense of $2,021,000 due to the change in vesting conditions of 2,150,000 shares of common
stock previously held in escrow during the year ended December 31, 2019 compared to the Company issuing 850,000 shares of common
stock valued at $697,000 for services, including 800,000 shares of common stock to various medical advisors during the year ended
December 31, 2018. The increase in research and development of $589,437 is due to higher expenses related to the continued eﬀorts to
obtain FDA Class III approval during the current year relative to the prior year.
 
Other income (expense) for 2019 and 2018 was $(508,183) and $(3,505,395), respectively. The decrease in other expense was due to
the decrease in loss on debt settlement of $3,509,330 oﬀset by an increase in interest expense of $508,183. The decrease in loss on debt
settlement was due to the Company issuing a total of 3,387,000 shares of common stock to settle notes payable balance of $172,500 and
$10,000 of accrued interest. The Company recorded a $3,509,330 loss on settlement of debt related to this transaction during the year
ended December 31, 2018 and did not have these transactions during the year ended December 31, 2019. The increase in interest expense
is due to amortization of beneﬁcial conversion features on convertible notes payable – related party during the current year and the
Company not having these transactions in the prior year.
  
 
18
 
  
Our net loss for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $6,602,295 as compared to a net loss of $5,402,369 for the prior year. The
increase in the net loss is due to an increase in stock based stock compensation of $3,183,250, an increase in research and development
expenses $589,437 and an increase in interest expense of $508,183 oﬀset by a decrease in loss on debt settlement of $3,509,330
compared to the prior year for the reasons described above.
 
Year ended December 31, 2018 versus year ended December 31, 2017
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company had $34,876 and $183,174 of revenues, respectively. The
decrease in revenues is due to a change in focus and a pivot substantially of all the Company’s energy in making our technology and
product more commercially viable, by attempting to obtain FDA class III approval for internal surgical purposes as noted under the heading
“Year ended December 31, 2019 versus year ended December 31, 2018” above. We continued this strategic focus though 2019.
 
Total operating expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 were $1,909,580 and $1,010,603, respectively. The
increase in operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in research and development expenses of approximately $57,000, an
increase in advertising and marketing expenses of approximately $124,000 and an increase of approximately $696,000 in
consulting/professional fees, which includes the Company issuing 850,000 shares of common stock valued at $697,000, including 800,000
shares to eight medical advisors.
 
Other income (expense) for 2018 and 2017 was $(3,505,395) and $(538,371), respectively. The increase in other expense was due to
the Company issuing a total of 3,387,000 shares of common stock to settle notes payable balance of $172,500 and $10,000 of accrued
interest. The Company recorded a $3,509,330 loss on settlement of debt related to this transaction. During 2017, the Company issued
4,200,000 shares of common stock to settle notes payable balance of $162,500 and accounts payable balances totaling $82,774. The fair
value of the stock issued was $664,000 and the Company recorded loss on debt settlement of $418,726. In 2017, the Company had $82,166
related to a loss on disputed inventory due to shipping product to a customer and the customer subsequently not paying for the invoice.
The Company determined that due to knowledge currently available this transaction was not recorded as revenue and recorded on a loss on
the inventory. The Company had $0 interest expense in 2018 due to paying oﬀ its notes payable in the ﬁrst quarter of 2018 compared to
$39,479 interest expense in 2017.
  
Our net loss for the 2018 was $5,402,369 as compared to a net loss of $1,466,789 for 2017. The increase in the net loss is due to the
decrease in revenues for the reasons described above and shares issued for services of $697,000 as mentioned above along with the
issuance of 3,387,000 shares of common stock to settle $172,500 of outstanding notes payable and $10,000 of accrued interest. The
Company recorded a $3,509,330 loss on settlement of debt related to this transaction.
 
UNAUDITED QUARTERLY DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS
 
The following table sets forth selected unaudited ﬁnancial data for each of the periods indicated.
 
    For the Quarters Ended (Unaudited)
   Sept. 30,  Jun. 30,  Mar. 31,  Sept. 30,  Jun. 30,  Mar. 31,  Sept. 30,  Jun. 30,  Mar. 31
   2019
(Restated)  2019
(Restated)  2019
(Restated)  2018
(Restated)  2018
(Restated)  2018
(Restated)  2017
(Restated)  2017
(Restated)  2017
(Restated
Revenue  $ -  $ 4,927  $ -  $ 9,048  $ 1,850  $ 18,943  $ 67,598  $ 41,816    96,4
Cost of goods
sold  -   502   -   3,480   1,790   14,760   21,290   21,296   15,3
                                             
Gross proﬁt   -    4,425    -    5,568    60    4,183    46,308    20,520    81,0
                                             
Selling,
general and
administrative  
328,720   
393,893   
2,635,993   
289,833   
901,951   
369,199   
181,819   
129,290   
149,7
                                             
Research and
development  149,994   214,863   27,405   13,527   39,041   9,391   -   -   
Total
operating
expenses  
478,714   
608,756   
2,663,398   
303,360   
940,992   
378,590   
181,819   
129,290   
149,7
                                             
Income (loss)
from
operations  
(478,714)  
(604,331)  
(2,663,398)  
(297,792)  
(940,932)  
(374,407)  
(135,511)  
(108,770)  
(68,7
Other income
(expense)  (46,154)  (202,752)  -   -   3,886   (3,509,330)  (5,000)  (8,854)  (15,6
                                             
Provision for
income taxes  -   --   -   -   -   -   -   -   
                                             
Net income
(loss) $ (524,868) $ (807,084) $ (2,663,398) $ (297,792) $ (937,046) $ (3,883,737) $ (140,511) $ (117,624) $ (84,3
                                             
Net loss per
share                                           
Basic &
diluted $ (0.00) $ (0.00) $ (0.02) $ (0.00) $ (0.01) $ (0.02) $ (0.00) $ (0.00)  (0
Weight
average
number of
shares
outstanding  
176,588,907   
175,270,956   
174,322,581   
172,822,654   
171,939,365   
169,970,509   
154,385,816   
153,704,591   
153,591,5
 
 
19
 
 
Three Months ended September 30, 2019 versus Three Months ended September 30, 2018
 
During the three months ended September 30, 2019 and 2018, the Company had $0 and $9,048 of revenues, respectively. The
decrease in revenues is due to the Company not pursuing sales in the current quarter compared to achieving minimal revenues in the
comparable quarter of the prior year.
 
Total operating expenses for the three months ended September 30, 2019 and 2018 were $478,714 and $297,972, respectively. The
increase in operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in research and development expenses from $13,527 to $149,994. The
increase in research and development expenses is due to higher expenditures on the ongoing process to obtain FDA Class III approval
during the current period.
 
Our net loss for the three months ended September 30, 2019 and 2018 was $524,868 and $297,792, respectively. The increase in the
net loss is due to reduced revenue, increased spending on research and development along with $46,154 of interest expense related to
amortization of debt discount on convertible notes.
 
Three Months Ended June 30, 2019 compared to Three Months Ended June 30, 2018
 
During the three months ended June 30, 2019 and 2018, the Company had $4,927 and $1,850 of revenues, respectively. The increase in
revenues is due to the Company having one customer order product during the current year compared to minimal revenues in the
comparable quarter of the prior year.
 
Total operating expenses for the three months ended June 30, 2019 and 2018 were $608,756 and $940,992, respectively. The decrease
in operating expenses is due primarily to a decrease in consulting/professional fees oﬀset by an increase in research and development
expenses of $175,822. The decrease in consulting/professional fees is due to the Company issuing 800,000 shares of common stock for
services valued at $642,500 to various medical advisors during the three months ended June 30, 2018 and during the three months ended
June 30, 2019 the Company did not issue any stock for services. The increase in research and development expenses is due to the
Company going through the process to obtain FDA class III approval during the current period and not having these expenses in the prior
year.
 
Our net loss for the three months ended June 30, 2019 and 2018 was $807,084 and $937,046, respectively. The decrease in the net loss
is due to the Company not issuing shares for services during the period compared to shares issued for services of $642,500 as mentioned
above, oﬀset by an increase in research and development expense of $175,822 and interest expense of $202,752 related to amortization of
debt discount related to beneﬁcial conversion feature on notes payable – related party.
 
 
20
 
  
Three Months Ended March 31, 2019 compared to Three Months Ended March 31, 2018
 
During the ﬁrst quarter of 2019 and 2018, the Company had $0 and $18,943 of revenues, respectively. Revenues decreased
compared to the prior year due to the continued focus which commenced in 2018 of substantially all the Company’s energy in making our
technology and product more commercially viable, by attempting to obtain FDA Class III approval for internal surgical purposes. This
process requires substantially all of the Company’s resources and energy so the focus and resources were redirected from sales and
marketing eﬀorts to the FDA process. See the discussion under the heading “Year ended December 31, 2019 versus year ended December
31, 2018” above for the strategic reasons for our change in focus.
 
Total operating expenses for the ﬁrst quarter of 2019 and 2018 were $2,663,398 and $378,590, respectively. The increase in
operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in consulting/professional fees. The Company issued 400,000 shares of common stock
for services valued at $380,000 and 2,150,000 shares of common stock valued at $2,021,000 vested during the ﬁrst quarter of 2019
compared to 50,000 shares of common stock for services valued at $54,500 during the ﬁrst quarter of 2018.
 
Our net loss for the quarter ended March 31, 2019 was $2,663,398 as compared to net loss of $3,883,737 for the comparable period
of the prior year. The decrease in the net loss is due to the Company having an increase in operating expenses of $2,284,808 as explained
above oﬀset by a decrease of $3,509,330 in loss on settlement of debt.
 
Three Months Ended September 30, 2018 compared to Three Months Ended September 30, 2017
 
During the three month ended September 30, 2018 and 2017, the Company had $9,048 and $67,598 of revenues, respectively.
Revenues decreased compared to the prior year due to the change in focus which commenced in 2018 of substantially all the Company’s
energy in making our technology and product more commercially viable, by seeking to obtain FDA class III approval for internal surgical
purposes. See the discussion under the heading “Year ended December 31, 2019 versus year ended December 31, 2018” above for the
strategic reasons for our change in focus.
 
Total operating expenses for the three months ended September 30, 2018 and 2017 were $303,360 and $181,819, respectively. The
increase in operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in consulting/professional fees of approximately $57,000, an increase in
advertising and marketing expenses of approximately $24,200 and an increase in travel expenses of approximately $25,140.
 
Our net loss for the three months ended September 30, 2018 and 2017 was $297,792 and $140,511, respectively. The increase in the
net loss is due to the decrease in revenues and the increase in the expenses mentioned in the preceding paragraph.
 
Three Months Ended June 30, 2018 compared to Three Months Ended June 30, 2017
 
During the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017, the Company had $1,850 and $41,816 of revenues, respectively. Revenues
decreased compared to the prior year due to the change in focus which commenced in 2018 of substantially all the Company’s energy in
making our technology and product more commercially viable, by seeking to obtain FDA class III approval for internal surgical purposes.
See the discussion under the heading “Year ended December 31, 2019 versus year ended December 31, 2018” above for the strategic
reasons for our change in focus. Total operating expenses for the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017 were $940,992 and $129,290,
respectively. The increase in operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in consulting/professional fees. The Company issued
800,000 shares of common stock valued at $642,500 to various medical advisors during the three months ended June 30, 2018.
 
Our net loss for the three months ended June 30, 2018 and 2017 was $937,046 and $117,624, respectively. The increase in the net
loss is due to the shares issued for services of $620,000 as mentioned above. The Company did not have this transaction during the three
months ended June 30, 2017.
 
Three Months Ended March 31, 2018 compared to Three Months Ended March 31, 2017
 
During the ﬁrst quarter of 2018 and 2017, the Company had $18,943 and $96,404 of revenues, respectively. Revenues decreased
compared to the prior year due to a change in focus of substantially all the Company’s energy in making our technology and product more
commercially viable, by seeking to obtain FDA class III approval for internal surgical purposes. See the discussion under the heading “Year
ended December 31, 2019 versus year ended December 31, 2018” above for the strategic reasons for our change in focus. Total operating
expenses for the ﬁrst quarter of 2018 and 2017 were $378,590 and $149,754, respectively. The increase in operating expenses is due
primarily to an increase in consulting/professional fees. The Company issued 50,000 shares of common stock for services valued at
$54,500 during the ﬁrst quarter of 2018 compared to $0 during the ﬁrst quarter of 2017. The Company has also hired additional consultants
as the Company’s operations have begun to increase.
 
 
21
 
  
Our net loss for the quarter ended March 31, 2018 was $3,883,737 as compared to $84,354 for the comparable period of the prior
year. The increase in the net loss is due to the shares issued for services of $54,500 as mentioned above along with the issuance of
3,877,000 shares of common stock to settle $172,500 of outstanding notes payable and $10,000 of accrued interest. The Company recorded
a $3,509,330 loss on settlement of debt related to this transaction. The Company did not have either of these transactions during the ﬁrst
quarter of 2017.
 
Financial Condition, Liquidity and Capital Resources
 
As of December 31, 2019, the Company had a negative working capital of $903,805. The Company has not yet attained a level of
operations, and for the foreseeable future will not be pursuing commercial operations, which will allow the it to meet its current overhead
while it focuses on its strategy of seeking FDA class III approval for internal surgical purposes, and opportunities which may arise from that
including, among other things, fostering interest from potential merger and acquisition candidates or commercial partners. If we are not
successful in our strategy, we cannot assure that we will be able to adjust to and fund a marketing and sale strategy, and if we do, we are
unable to assure we will attain proﬁtable operations within the next few business operating cycles or at all. The report of our independent
registered public accounting ﬁrm on our 2019, 2018 and 2017 ﬁnancial statements includes an explanatory paragraph expressing
substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. While the Company has funded its initial operations with private
placements, and secured loans from related parties, there can be no assurance that adequate ﬁnancing will continue to be available to the
Company and, if available, on terms that are favorable to the Company. Our ability to continue as a going concern is also dependent on
many events outside of our direct control, including, among other things, our ability to achieve our business goals and objectives, as well
as improvement in the economic climate.
 
Cash Flows
 
The Company’s cash on hand at December 31, 2019, December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017 was $16,624, $31,273 and
$189,942, respectively.
 
The following table summarizes selected items from our statements of cash ﬂows for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018,
and 2017:
 
    For the Years Ended December 31,  
(in thousands)   2019    2018    2017  
Net cash used in operating activities  $(1,766,764) $(1,278,662) $ (649,675)
Net cash used in investing activities    -    -    - 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities   1,752,115   1,119,993    810,250 
                 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents  $ (14,649) $(158,669) $160,575 
  
Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Operating Activities
 
Net cash used in operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $1,766,764. The Company had a net loss of
$6,602,295 oﬀset by stock-based compensation of $3,880,250 and amortization of debt discount of $508,183. The Company also had an
increase in inventory of $44,868, an increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses of $367,836, an increase in accrued liabilities –
related party of $74,130 and a decrease if prepaid and other assets of $50,000.
 
 
22
 
 
Net cash used in operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $1,278,662. The Company had net loss of
$5,402,369 oﬀset by stock issued for services of $697,000, expenses paid by an oﬃcer of $30,000 and loss on settlement of debt of
$3,509,330. The Company also had a decrease in accounts receivable of $371, a decrease in inventory of $5,411, an increase in prepaids
and other current assets of $37,886, a decrease in accounts payable and accrued expenses of $14,019 and a decrease in accrued liabilities
– related party of $71,500.
  
Net cash used in operating activities was $649,675 for the year ended December 31, 2017. The Company incurred a net loss of
$1,466,789, an increase in inventory of $71,040 and an increase in prepaid and other current assets of $12,114 oﬀset by a decrease in
accounts receivable of $99,910, $144,000 in stock for services, $416,726 in loss on debt settlement, $8,479 related to common stock issued
as debt ﬁnancing costs, $82,166 related to loss on disputed inventory an increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses of $61,432
and an increase in accrued liabilities – related party of $87,555.
  
Net Cash Used by Investing Activities
 
The Company did not have any investing activities during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 or 2017.
 
Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Financing Activities
 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $1,752,115. This was due to the Company
receiving $1,255,750 in proceeds from the sale of stock and receiving net proceeds of $496,365 from a related party.
 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $1,119,993. This was due to the Company
receiving $1,415,200 in proceeds from the sale of stock and repaying a net amount of $280,207 in related party advances and $15,000 in
notes payable.
  
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities for the year ended December 31, 2017 was $810,250. The Company received net proceeds
from related party of $133,750, net proceeds on notes payable of $32,500 and $644,000 from the sale of common stock.
 
Oﬀ-Balance Sheet Arrangements
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, we have no oﬀ-balance sheet arrangements.
 
Related Parties
 
Information concerning related party transactions is included in the ﬁnancial statements and related notes, appearing elsewhere in
this annual report on Form 10-K.
 
Critical Accounting Policies
 
Revenue Recognition
 
During the year ended December 31, 2017, the Company recognized revenue per ASC 605 – Revenue Recognition.  Under ASC 605
revenue was recognized when persuasive evidence of an arrangement existed, product had been delivered or services had been rendered,
the price was ﬁxed or determinable and collectability was reasonably assured. Revenue was recognized net of estimated sales returns and
allowances.
  
Eﬀective January 1, 2018, the Company adopted ASC 606 — Revenue from Contracts with Customers. Under ASC 606, the Company
recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by applying the following steps: (1) identify the contract with a customer; (2)
identify the performance obligations in the contract; (3) determine the transaction price; (4) allocate the transaction price to each
performance obligation in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each performance obligation is satisﬁed.
 
The Company receives orders for its HemoStyp products directly from its customers. Revenues are recognized based on the agreed
upon sales or transaction price with the customer when control of the promised goods are transferred to the customer.  The transfer of
goods to the customer and satisfaction of the Company’s performance obligation will occur either at the time when products are shipped or
when the products arrive and are received by the customer.  The Company provided a 3% net 30 discount to one of its customers. No other
discounts were oﬀered by the Company. The Company does not provide an estimate for returns as there is no anticipation for any returns in
the normal course of business.
     
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company accounts for share-based compensation under the provisions of ASC 718, Compensation-Stock Compensation. Under
the fair value recognition provisions, stock-based compensation expense is measured at the fair value of the consideration received, or the
fair value of the equity instruments issued, or liabilities incurred, whichever is more reliably measured. Share-based compensation for all
stock-based awards to employees and directors is recognized as an expense over the requisite service period, which is generally the
vesting period.
 
The Company accounted for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with ASC 505-50-30-11, until
January 1, 2019, which provides that an issuer shall measure the fair value of the equity instruments in these transactions using the stock
price and other measurement assumptions as of the earlier of the following dates, referred to as the measurement date:
 
 i. The date at which a commitment for performance by the counterparty to earn the equity instruments is reached (a performance
commitment); and
     
  ii.The date at which the counterparty’s performance is complete.
 
As of January 1, 2019, the Company accounted for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with
Accounting Standard Update (ASU) 2018-07, Compensation—Stock Compensation (Topic 718): Improvements to Nonemployee Share-Based
Payment Accounting, which requires that such equity instruments are recorded at the value on the grant date.
 
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
 
The ﬁnancial statements required by Item 8 can be found beginning on Page F-3 of this report. 
 
 
23
 
  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
 
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of United Health Products, Inc. 
 
Opinion on the Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets of United Health Products, Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2019, 2018, and
2017, the related statements of operations, stockholders' deﬁciency and cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended
December 31, 2019, and the related notes to the ﬁnancial statements (collectively, the ﬁnancial statements). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, and the
results of its operations and its cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
 
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the
Company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated
Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission in 2013. Our report dated July 9, 2020
expressed an opinion that the Company had not maintained eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2019,
based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission in 2013.
  
Restatement
 
As discussed in Note 2 to the ﬁnancial statements, the 2018 and 2017 ﬁnancial statements have been restated to correct a misstatement.
 
Quarterly Financial Information
 
The selected quarterly ﬁnancial data included in Note 2 to the ﬁnancial statements contains information that we did not audit, and,
accordingly, we do not express an opinion on that data. Further, we did not review the quarterly data in accordance with the standards of
the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.
 
Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue as a going concern. As discussed in
Note 3 to the ﬁnancial statements, the Company has suﬀered recurring losses from operations, its total liabilities exceed its total assets,
and its operations have not provided adequate cash ﬂows. This raises substantial doubt about the Company's ability to continue as a going
concern. Management's plans in regard to these matters also are described in Note 3. The ﬁnancial statements do not include any
adjustments that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty.
 
Adoption of New Accounting Pronouncements
  
As discussed in Note 3 to the ﬁnancial statements, the Company has changed its method of accounting for revenue recognition eﬀective
January 1, 2018 due to the adoption of Accounting Standards Codiﬁcation 606.  Also discussed in Note 3 to the ﬁnancial statements, the
Company changed its method of accounting for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees eﬀective January 1, 2019 due to the
adoption of Accounting Standards Codiﬁcation 718.
  
Basis for Opinion
 
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s ﬁnancial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the
Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audits to
obtain reasonable assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our
audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or
fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the
amounts and disclosures in the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant
estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits
provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
/s/ Mac Accounting Group, LLP
 
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2019.
 
Midvale, Utah
July 9, 2020 
  
 
F-1
 
 
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
 
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of United Health Products, Inc.
 
Opinion on the Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
We have audited United Health Products, Inc.'s (the Company) internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on
criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission in 2013. In our opinion, because of the eﬀect of the material weaknesses described below on the achievement of the
objectives of the control criteria, the Company has not maintained eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31,
2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission in 2013.
  
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the
balance sheets of United Health Products, Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, the related statements of
operations, stockholders' deﬁciency and cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, and the related
notes to the ﬁnancial statements of the Company and our report dated July 9, 2020 expressed an unqualiﬁed opinion.
   
A material weakness is a deﬁciency, or a combination of deﬁciencies, in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, such that there is a
reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of the company's annual or interim ﬁnancial statements will not be prevented or
detected on a timely basis. The following material weaknesses have been identiﬁed and included in management's assessment:
 
  - Inadequate Corporate Governance
  - Inadequate Internal Control Structure and Control Environment
  - Lack of IT General Controls
  - Lack of Segregation of Duties
  - Lack of Suﬃcient Accounting Resources with SEC Experience, US GAAP Experience, and Tax Accounting Expertise
 
These material weaknesses were considered in determining the nature, timing and extent of audit tests applied in our audit of the 2019
ﬁnancial statements, and this report does not aﬀect our report dated July 9, 2020 on those ﬁnancial statements.
   
Basis for Opinion
 
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting and for its assessment of the
eﬀectiveness of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting in the accompanying Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting based on our audit. We are a public
accounting ﬁrm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with U.S. federal
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to
obtain reasonable assurance about whether eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our
audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists,
and testing and evaluating the design and operating eﬀectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audit also included
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis
for our opinion.
 
Deﬁnition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
A company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of
ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles. A company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance
of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reﬂect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide
reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with
authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the company's assets that could have a material eﬀect on the ﬁnancial
statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of
any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in
conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
/s/ Mac Accounting Group, LLP
 
Midvale, Utah
July 9, 2020
  
 
F-2
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Balance Sheets
 
   December
31,
2019  December
31,
2018  December
31,
2017 
      (Restated)  (Restated) 
ASSETS
Current Assets             
Cash and Cash Equivalents  $ 16,624  $ 31,273  $ 189,942 
Accounts receivable    -    -    371 
Inventory    76,848    31,980    37,391 
Prepaid and other current assets    -    50,000    12,114 
Total current assets    93,472    113,253    239,818 
                 
TOTAL ASSETS  $ 93,472  $ 113,253  $ 239,818 
                 
LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS’ DEFICIENCY
Current Liabilities                
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 512,476  $ 152,970  $ 176,990 
Accrued liabilities – related party    119,016    36,556    108,055 
Loans payable – related parties    -    74,421    324,628 
Convertible loans payable - related parties    365,785    -    - 
Notes payable    -    -    182,500 
Total current liabilities    997,277    263,947    792,173 
                 
TOTAL LIABILITIES    997,277    263,947    792,173 
                 
Commitments and Contingencies     -     -     - 
                 
Stockholders’ Deﬁciency                
                 
Common Stock - $.001 par value, 300,000,000 shares authorized, 178,300,337,
173,943,138 and 165,152,410 shares issued at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017  178,300   173,943   165,152 
Additional paid-in capital   25,045,754   19,200,927   13,405,688 
Accumulated deﬁcit   (26,127,859)  (19,525,564)  (14,123,195)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency    (903,805)   (150,694)   (552,355)
                 
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS’ DEFICIENCY  $ 93,472  $ 113,253  $ 239,818 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-3
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Operations
 
   For the Years Ended
December 31, 
    2019    2018    2017  
      (Restated)  (Restated) 
              
Revenues  $ 4,927  $ 34,876  $ 183,174 
Cost of sales    1,316    22,270    100,989 
Gross proﬁt    3,611   12,606    82,185 
                 
Operating Costs and Expenses                
Selling, general and administrative expenses   5,431,335   1,832,629    990,667 
Research and development expenses    666,388    76,951    19,936 
Total Operating Expenses   6,097,723   1,909,580   1,010,603 
                 
Loss from Operations   (6,094,112)  (1,896,974)   (928,418)
                 
Other income (expenses)                
Interest Expense    (508,183)   -    (39,479)
Other income    -    3,935    - 
Loss on disputed inventory    -    -    (82,166)
Loss on settlement of debt    -   (3,509,330)   (416,726)
Total other income (expense)    (508,183)  (3,505,395)   (538,371)
                 
Income tax expense    -    -    - 
                 
Net Loss  $(6,602,295) $(5,402,369) $(1,466,789)
                 
Net Loss per common share:                
Basic and diluted  $ (0.04) $ (0.03) $ (0.01)
                 
Weighted average number of shares outstanding   175,876,273   172,119,786   155,826,936 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-4
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statement of Stockholders’ Deﬁciency
For the Years Ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
 
           Additional         
    Common Stock   Paid-in  Accumulated    
   Shares  Amount  Capital  Deﬁcit   Total  
                      
Balance at December 31, 2016 - Restated   153,591,590  $ 153,591  $11,956,770  $(12,656,406) $ (546,045)
                           
Issuance of common stock for notes payable   2,500,000    2,500    232,500    -    235,000 
                           
Issuance of common stock for accounts payable   1,700,000    1,700    427,300    -    429,000 
                           
Issuance of common stock for services    200,000    200    143,800    -    144,000 
                           
Sale of common stock   7,047,820    7,048    636,952    -    644,000 
                           
Common stock issued as debt ﬁnancing costs    113,000    113    8,366    -    8,479 
                           
Net Loss - Restated    -    -    -   (1,466,789)  (1,466,789)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2017 - Restated   165,152,410   165,152  13,405,688  (14,123,195)  (552,355)
                           
Issuance of shares for notes payable and accrued
interest  3,387,000   3,387   3,688,443   -   3,691,830 
                           
Issuance of common stock for services    850,000    850    696,150    -    697,000 
                           
Common stock held in escrow   2,150,000    2,150    (2,150)    -    - 
                           
Sale of common Stock   2,403,728    2,404   1,412,796    -   1,415,200 
                           
Net Loss - Restated    -    -    -   (5,402,369)  (5,402,369)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2018 - Restated   173,943,138   173,943  19,200,927  (19,525,564)  (150,694)
                           
Stock-based compensation modiﬁcation expense on
shares held in escrow  -   -   2,021,000   -   2,021,000 
                           
Issuance of common stock for services   1,925,000    1,925   1,857,325    -   1,859,250 
                           
Issuance of shares for notes payable – related party   410,000    410    204,590    -    205,000 
                           
Sale of common stock   2,022,199    2,022   1,253,728    -   1,255,750 
                           
Beneﬁcial conversion feature    -    -    508,183    -    508,183 
                           
Net Loss    -    -        (6,602,295)  (6,602,295)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2019   178,300,337  $ 178,300  $25,045,754  $(26,127,859) $ (903,805)
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
  
 
F-5
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Cash Flows
 
   For the Years Ended
December 31, 
    2019    2018   2017  
      (Restated)  (Restated) 
              
Cash Flows from Operating Activities:             
Net Loss  $(6,602,295) $(5,402,369) $(1,466,789)
Adjustments to Reconcile Net Loss to Net Cash Used in Operating Activities:                
Stock based compensation   3,880,250    697,000    144,000 
Loss on settlement of debt    -   3,509,330    416,726 
Expenses paid by oﬃcer    -    30,000    - 
Loss on disputed inventory    -    -    82,166 
Common stock issued for debt ﬁnancing costs    -    -    8,479 
Amortization of debt discount    508,183    -    - 
                 
Changes in assets and liabilities:                
Accounts receivable    -    371    99,910 
Inventory    (44,868)   5,411    (71,040)
Prepaid and other current assets    50,000    (37,886)   (12,114)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses    367,836    (9,019)   61,432 
Accrued liabilities – related party    74,130    (71,500)   87,555 
Net Cash Used In Operating Activities   (1,766,764)  (1,278,662)   (649,675)
                 
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:                
Net Cash Used in Investing Activities    -    -    - 
                 
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:                
Repayment to related parties    (161,135)   (295,207)   (21,500)
Proceeds from related parties    657,500    15,000    155,250 
Repayments on notes payable    -    (15,000)   (77,500)
Proceeds from loans payable    -    -    110,000 
Proceeds from issuance of common stock   1,255,750   1,415,200    644,000 
Net Cash Provided By Financing Activities   1,752,115   1,119,993    810,250 
                 
Increase (decrease) in Cash and Cash Equivalents    (14,649)   (158,669)   160,575 
Cash and Cash Equivalents - Beginning of period    31,273    189,942    29,367 
                 
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS - END OF PERIOD  $ 16,624  $ 31,273    189,942 
                 
Supplemental cash ﬂow information:                
Cash paid for interest  $ -  $ -  $ 16,000 
Cash paid for income taxes  $ -  $ -  $ - 
                 
Schedule of Non-Cash Financing Activities:                
Issuance of common stock for accounts payable  $ -  $ -  $ 429,000 
Shares issued and held in escrow  $ -  $ 2,150  $ - 
Shares issued for loans payable – related party  $ 205,000  $ -  $ - 
Accounts payable converted to note payable  $ -  $ -  $ 162,500 
Common stock issued for settlement of debt and accrued interest  $ -  $ 182,500  $ 235,000 
  
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-6
 
  
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARY COMPANY
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019, 2018 AND 2017
 
Note 1. Description of the Business
  
United Health Products, Inc. (“United” or the “Company”) is a product development and solutions company focusing on the wound-
care industry and disposable medical supplies markets. The Company produces an innovative gauze product that absorbs exudate (ﬂuids
which have been discharged from blood vessels) by forming a gel-like substance upon contact.
 
Note 2. Restatement of Financial Statements
 
The Company’s management, concluded that, because of two separate transactions, as discussed in further detail below, the
Company’s previously issued ﬁnancial statements for all periods beginning with the quarterly period ended March 31, 2017 through
December 31, 2018 (collectively, the “Aﬀected Periods”) should no longer be relied upon. As such, the Company is restating in this Annual
Report its ﬁnancial statements for the following periods: (i) the years ended December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, and (ii) all
quarterly periods of 2019, 2018 and 2017.
 
The ﬁrst transaction was a revenue transaction that involved a sale of a lost in-bound shipment of product that was recognized and
recorded in the ﬁrst quarter of 2017. This sale was canceled in the second quarter of 2017 and the transaction was subsequently corrected
to back out the revenue and exclude it from the audited 2017 annual ﬁnancial statements which were included in our 2017 Annual Report
on Form 10-K. The Company inadvertently did not go back and restate the prior interim ﬁnancial statements for 2017 to reﬂect the
correction. The second transaction was a revenue transaction regarding product that was in the shipping process at the end of December
2017 that was recognized and recorded as revenue in the 2017 audited annual ﬁnancial statements where there was a question related to
the timing of revenue recognition due to the shipping and receiving terms. The Company’s customer has not paid the Company for this
product and the Company, in consultation with its former auditor, ultimately wrote oﬀ the receivable in the third and fourth quarters of 2018
as a bad debt expense. Those write-oﬀs were reﬂected in the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended September 30,
2018 and Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018. However, in light of the information currently
available to the Company, the Company determined that no revenue should have been recognized in 2017 or 2018 due to the customer
disputing the shipment and refusing to pay the amount owed and therefore the transaction did not meet all of the revenue recognition
criteria under ASC 606, which the Company adopted on January 1, 2018. The Company is continuing collection eﬀorts to recover payment
from its customer, and it instituted a lawsuit against the customer in February 2020 to recover payment, which is ongoing (see “Note 10”).
Due to uncertainties inherent in litigation, the Company cannot predict the outcome of this action.
  
During the process of restating its ﬁnancial statements due to the transaction mentioned above, other adjustments were noted and
related to inventory valuation, loss on settlement of debt and equity transactions along with adjustments to accruals based on factors
known at the time of this ﬁling versus what was known as of the original ﬁling date.  There was no impact on the statement of operations
for the 3 months ended September 30, 2017
   
Impact of the Restatement – December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017
 
    Year Ended December 31, 2018  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data:             
Revenue  $ 45,862  $ (10,986) $ 34,876 
Cost of sales  $  96,701  $  (74,431) $  22,270 
Gross proﬁt  $  (50,839) $  63,445  $  12,606 
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $ 2,249,780  $ (417,151) $ 1,832,629 
Total operating expenses  $ 2,326,731  $ (417,151) $ 1,909,580 
Loss from operations  $ (2,377,570) $  480,596  $ (1,896,974)
Loss on settlement of debt  $ (3,632,500) $  123,170  $ (3,509,330)
Total other income (expense)  $ (3,628,565) $  123,170  $ (3,505,395)
Net loss  $ (6,006,135) $  603,766  $ (5,402,369)
Net loss per share, basic and diluted  $ (0.04) $  0.01  $ (0.03)
 
 
F-7
 
 
    As of December 31, 2018  
   As
Previously         
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Balance Sheet Data:             
Accounts receivable  $ 11,010  $  (11,010) $ - 
Inventory  $  83,694  $  (51,714) $  31,980 
Prepaid and other current assets  $  -  $  50,000  $  50,000 
Total current assets  $  125,977  $  (12,724) $  113,253 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $  243,713  $  (90,743) $  152,970 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $  25,000  $  11,556  $  36,556 
Liability for unissued shares  $  201,843  $ (201,843) $  - 
Loans payable – related party  $  8,121  $  66,300  $  74,421 
Total liabilities  $  478,677  $ (214,730) $  263,947 
Common stock  $  185,943  $  (12,000) $  173,943 
Additional paid-in capital  $ 19,198,343  $  2,584  $ 19,200,927 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $ (19,736,986) $  211,422  $ (19,525,564)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (352,700) $  202,006  $ (150,694)
   
    Year Ended December 31, 2018  
   As
Previously
Reported  
Adjustment  
As Restated 
Cash Flows Data:             
Net loss  $(6,006,135) $  603,766  $(5,402,369)
Loss on debt settlement  $3,632,500  $ (123,170) $ 3,509,330 
Write-oﬀ of inventory  $  60,789  $  (60,789) $  - 
Stock for services  $  674,500  $  22,500  $  697,000 
Bad debt expense  $  447,574  $ (447,574) $  - 
Accounts receivable  $  (10,614) $  10,985  $  371 
Inventory  $  19,051  $  (13,640) $  5,411 
Prepaid and other current assets  $  12,114  $  (50,000) $  (37,886)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $  (71,941) $  57,922  $  (14,019)
Accrued liabilities – related party  $  (61,500) $  (10,000) $  (71,500)
Total cash used in operating activities  $ (1,273,662) $  (10,000) $ (1,283,662)
                 
Repayment to related parties  $ (305,207) $  10,000  $ (295,207)
Total cash provided by ﬁnancing activities  $1,114,993  $  10,000  $1,124,993 
 
    Year Ended December 31, 2017
   As
Previously           
   Reported   Adjustment   As
Restated 
Statement of Operations Data:                
Revenue  $ 645,652  $ (462,474) $ 183,174 
Cost of sales  $  67,016  $  33,973  $  100,989 
Gross proﬁt  $  578,636  $ (496,451) $  82,185 
General and administrative  $ 1,278,018  $ (287,351) $  990,667 
Total operating expenses  $ 1,297,954  $ (287,351) $ 1,010,603 
Loss from operations  $ (719,318) $ (209,100) $ (928,418)
Interest expense  $  (31,000) $  (8,479) $  (39,479)
Loss on customer disputed inventory shipment  $  -  $  (82,166) $  (82,166)
Loss on settlement of debt  $ (184,650) $ (232,076) $ (416,726)
Total other income (expense)  $ (215,650) $ (322,721) $ (538,371)
Net loss  $ (934,968) $ (531,821) $(1,466,789)
 
 
F-8
 
 
    As of December 31, 2017  
   As
Previously         
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Balance Sheet Data:             
Accounts receivable  $ 447,970  $ (447,599) $ 371 
Inventory  $ 163,534  $ (126,143) $ 37,391 
Total current assets  $ 813,560  $ (573,742) $ 239,818 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 325,654  $ (148,665) $ 176,989 
Accrued liabilities – related parties  $ 86,500  $ 21,556  $ 108,056 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 211,843  $ (211,843) $ - 
Loans payable – related parties  $ 268,328  $ 56,300  $ 324,628 
Total liabilities  $1,074,825  $ (282,652) $ 792,173 
Common stock  $ 164,969  $ 183  $ 165,152 
Additional paid-in capital  $13,304,617  $ 101,071  $13,405,688 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(13,730,851) $ (392,344) $(14,123,195)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (261,265) $ (291,090) $ (552,355)
  
    Year Ended December 31, 2017  
   As
Previously         
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Cash Flows Data:             
Net loss  $ (934,968) $ (531,821) $(1,466,789)
Stock based compensation  $ 429,000  $ (285,000) $ 144,000 
Loss on settlement of debt  $ 184,650  $ 232,076  $ 416,726 
Loss on customer disputed inventory shipment  $ -  $ 82,166  $ 82,166 
Bad debt expense  $ 20,226  $ (20,226) $ - 
Common stock issued for debt ﬁnancing costs  $ -  $ 8,479  $ 8,479 
Accounts receivable  $ (362,569) $ 462,479  $ 99,910 
Inventory  $ (101,566) $ 30,526  $ (71,040)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 44,941  $ 16,491  $ 61,432 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ 86.500  $ 1,055  $ 87,555 
Total cash used in operating activities  $ (645,900) $ (3,775) $ (649,675)
                 
Proceeds from related parties  $ 111,500  $ 43,750  $ 155,250 
Proceeds from issuance of common stock  $ 683,975  $ (39,975) $ 644,000 
Total cash provided by ﬁnancing activities  $ 806,475  $ 3,775  $ 810,250 
    
Impact of the Restatement – Quarterly Interim Periods (Unaudited)
 
   Three Months Ended September 30, 2019 
   As
Previously
Reported  
Adjustment  
As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $ 294,847  $ 33,873  $ 328,720 
Research and development expenses  $ 141,820  $ 8,174  $ 149,994 
Total operating expenses  $ 436,667  $ 42,047  $ 478,714 
Loss from operations  $ (436,667) $ (42,047) $ (478,714)
Interest expense  $ -  $ (46,154) $ (46,154)
Total other income (expense)  $ -  $ (46,154) $ (46,154)
Net loss  $ (436,667) $ (88,201) $ (524,868)
 
 
F-9
 
 
   Nine Months Ended September 30, 2019 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 25,009  $ (20,082) $ 4,927 
Cost of goods sold  $ 9,887  $ (9,385) $ 502 
Gross proﬁt  $ 15,122  $ (10,697) $ 4,425 
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $3,609,708  $ (251,101) $3,358,607 
Research and development expenses  $ 384,088  $ 8,175  $ 392,263 
Total operating expense  $3,993,796  $ (242,926) $3,750,870 
Loss from operations  $(3,978,674) $ 232,229  $(3,746,445)
Interest expense  $ (156,890) $ (92,016) $ (248,906)
Total other income (expense)  $ (156,890) $ (92,016) $ (248,906)
Net loss  $(4,135,564) $ 140,213  $(3,995,351)
 
   Three Months Ended September 30, 2018 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $ 403,359  $ (113,526) $ 289,833 
Research and development expenses  $ -  $ 13,527  $ 13,527 
Total operating expenses  $ 403,359  $ (100,000) $ 303,359 
Loss from operations  $ (397,791) $ 100,000  $ (297,791)
Net loss  $ (397,791) $ 100,000  $ (297,791)
 
   Nine Months Ended September 30, 2018 
   As
Previously           
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 40,826  $ (10,985) $ 29,841 
Cost of goods sold  $ 14,147  $ 5,884  $ 20,031 
Gross proﬁt  $ 26,679  $ (16,869) $ 9,810 
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $1,700,442  $ (139,459) $1,560,983 
Research and development expenses  $ -  $ 61,958  $ 61,958 
Total operating expense  $1,700,442  $ (77,500) $1,622,942 
Loss from operations  $(1,673,763) $ 60,632  $(1,613,131)
Loss on settlement of debt  $(3,632,500) $ 123,170  $(3,509,330)
Total other income (expense)  $(3,628,614) $ 123,170  $(3,505,444)
Net loss  $(5,302,377) $ 183,802  $(5,118,575)
 
 
F-10
 
  
   Nine Months Ended September 30, 2017 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 336,543  $ (130,725) $ 205,818 
Gross proﬁt  $ 278,578  $ (130,725) $ 147,853 
Loss from operations  $ (182,285) $ (130,725) $ (313,010)
Interest expense  $ (21,000) $ (8,479) $ (29,479)
Total other income (expense)  $ (21,000) $ (8,479) $ (29,479)
Net loss  $ (203,285) $ (139,204) $ (342,489)
 
    As of September 30, 2019  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 36,019  $ (31,092) $ 4,927 
Inventory  $ 109,627  $ (42,328) $ 67,299 
Total current assets  $ 233,865  $ (73,421) $ 160,444 
Total assets  $ 233,865  $ (73,421) $ 160,444 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 306,895  $ (53,715) $ 253,180 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ 17,251  $ 8,979  $ 26,230 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 201,843  $ (201,843) $ - 
Loans payable – related party  $ -  $ 61,421  $ 61,421 
Total current liabilities  $ 525,989  $ (185,158) $ 340,831 
Total liabilities  $ 525,989  $ (185,158) $ 340,831 
Additional paid-in capital  $23,403,837  $ (239,898) $23,163,939 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(23,872,550) $ 351,636  $(23,520,914)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (292,124) $ 111,737  $ (180,387)
 
    As of September 30, 2018  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 356,399  $ (347,599) $ 8,800 
Inventory  $ 160,833  $ (143,013) $ 17,820 
Total current assets  $ 648,120  $ (490,612) $ 157,508 
Total assets  $ 648,120  $ (490,612) $ 157,508 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 273,891  $ (141,212) $ 132,679 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ 86,500  $ 4,100  $ 90,600 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 326,843  $ (326,843) $ - 
Loans payable – related party  $ 169,828  $ 66,300  $ 236,128 
Total current liabilities  $ 857,062  $ (397,655) $ 459,407 
Total liabilities  $ 857,062  $ (397,655) $ 459,407 
Common stock  $ 184,823  $ (11,750) $ 173,073 
Additional paid-in capital  $18,639,463  $ 127,334  $18,766,797 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(19,033,228) $ (208,542) $(19,241,770)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (208,942) $ (92,957) $ (301,899)
 
 
F-11
 
 
    As of September 30, 2017  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 165,609  $ (136,071) $ 29,538 
Inventory  $ 79,863  $ (10,005) $ 69,858 
Total current assets  $ 305,795  $ (146,076) $ 159,719 
Total assets  $ 305,795  $ (146,076) $ 159,719 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 460,681  $ (88,287) $ 372,394 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 145,543  $ (145,543) $ - 
Loans payable – related parties  $ 262,078  $ 12,550  $ 274,628 
Total current liabilities  $1,070,802  $ (221,280) $ 849,522 
Common stock  $ 156,697  $ (76) $ 156,621 
Additional paid-in capital  $12,077,464  $ 75,005  $12,152,469 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(12,999,168) $ 272  $(12,998,896)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (765,007) $ 75,201  $ (689,806)
 
   Nine Months Ended September 30, 2019 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net loss  $(4,135,564) $ 140,214  $(3,995,350)
Stock based compensation  $2,723,500  $ (322,500) $2,401,000 
Amortization of debt discount  $ 156,890  $ 92,018  $ 248,908 
Accounts receivable  $ (25,009) $ 20,082  $ (4,927)
Inventory  $ (25,933) $ (9,386) $ (35,319)
Prepaid and other current assets  $ -  $ 50,000  $ 50,000 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 63,182  $ 29,572  $ 92,754 
 
   Nine Months Ended September 30, 2018 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net loss  $(5,302,377) $ 183,802  $(5,118,575)
Stock based compensation  $ 674,500  $ 22,500  $ 697,000 
Loss on settlement of debt  $3,632,500  $ (123,170) $3,509,330 
Bad debt expense  $ 100,000  $ (100,000) $ - 
Inventory  $ 2,701  $ 16,871  $ 19,572 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ -  $ (10,000) $ (10,000)
Cash used in operating activities  $ (900,754) $ (10,000) $ (910,754)
   $    $    $   
Proceeds from notes payable – related party  $ 15,000  $ 10,000  $ 25,000 
Cash provided by ﬁnancing activities  $ 841,700  $ 10,000  $ 851,700 
 
 
F-12
 
  
   Nine Months Ended September 30, 2017 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net loss  $ (203,285) $ (139,204) $ (342,489)
Shares issued for debt ﬁnancing costs  $ -  $ 8,479  $ 8,479 
Accounts receivable  $ (59,982) $ 130,725  $ 70,743 
Inventory  $ (17,895) $ (3,447) $ (21,342)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ (14,382) $ 3,447  $ (10,935)
 
    Three Months Ended June 30, 2019  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenue  $ 25,009  $ (20,082) $ 4,927 
Cost of goods sold  $ 9,887  $ (9,385) $ 502 
Gross proﬁt  $ 15,122  $ (10,697) $ 4,425 
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $ 356,369  $ 37,524  $ 393,893 
Total operating expenses  $ 571,232  $ 37,524  $ 608,756 
Loss from operations  $ (556,110) $ (48,222) $ (604,332)
Interest expense  $ (156,890) $ (45,862) $ (202,752)
Total other income (expense)  $ (156,890) $ (45,862) $ (202,752)
Net loss  $ (713,000) $ (94,084) $ (807,084)
  
    Six Months Ended June 30, 2019  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 25,009  $ (20,082) $ 4,927 
Cost of goods sold  $ 9,887  $ (9,385) $ 502 
Gross proﬁt  $ 15,122  $ (10,697) $ 4,425 
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $3,314,861  $ (284,975) $3,029,886 
Total operating expense  $3,557,129  $ (284,975) $3,272,154 
Loss from operations  $(3,542,007) $ 274,277  $(3,267,730)
Interest expense  $ (156,890) $ (45,862) $ (202,752)
Total other income (expense)  $ (156,890) $ (45,862) $ (202,752)
Net loss  $(3,698,897) $ 228,415  $(3,470,482)
 
 
F-13
 
 
    Three Months Ended June 30, 2018  
   As
Previously         
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $ 918,491  $ (16,540) $ 901,951 
Research and development expenses  $ -  $ 39,041  $ 39,041 
Total operating expenses  $ 918,491  $ 22,501  $ 940,992 
Loss from operations  $ (918,491) $ (22,501) $ (940,992)
Net loss  $ (914,545) $ (22,501) $ (937,046)
  
    Six Months Ended June 30, 2018  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 31,778  $ (10,985) $ 20,793 
Cost of goods sold  $ 10,667  $ 5,884  $ 16,551 
Gross proﬁt  $ 21,111  $ (16,869) $ 4,242 
General and administrative expenses  $1,297,083  $ 22,498  $1,271,150 
Total operating expenses  $1,297,083  $ 22,498  $1,319,581 
Loss from operations  $(1,275,972) $ (39,367) $(1,315,339)
Loss on settlement of debt  $(3,632,500) $ 123,170  $(3,509,330)
Total other income (expense)  $(3,628,614) $ 123,170  $(3,505,444)
Net loss  $(4,904,586) $ 83,803  $(4,820,783)
 
    Three Months Ended June 30, 2017  
   As
Previously         
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Interest expense  $ (11,000) $ 2,146  $ (8,854)
Total other income (expense)  $ (11,000) $ 2,146  $ (8,854)
Net loss  $ (119,768) $ 2,146  $ 117,622 
 
    Six Months Ended June 30, 2017  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data  (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 268,945  $ (130,725) $ 138,220 
Gross proﬁt  $ 232,270  $ (130,725) $ 101,545 
Loss from operations  $ (46,777) $ (130,725) $ (177,502)
Interest expense  $ (16,000) $ (8,479) $ (24,479)
Total other income (expense)  $ (16,000) $ (8,479) $ (24,479)
Net loss  $ (62,777) $ (139,204) $ (201,981)
 
    As of June 30, 2019  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 36,019  $ (31,092) $ 4,927 
Inventory  $ 99,807  $ (42,328) $ 57,479 
Total current assets  $ 636,721  $ (73,421) $ 563,300 
Total assets  $ 636,721  $ (73,421) $ 563,300 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 235,214  $ (95,763) $ 139,451 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ 55,121  $ 8,979  $ 64,100 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 211,843  $ (211,843) $ - 
Loans payable – related party  $ -  $ 61,421  $ 61,421 
Total current liabilities  $ 502,178  $ (237,205) $ 264,973 
Total liabilities  $ 502,178  $ (237,205) $ 264,973 
Additional paid-in capital  $23,403,837  $ (286,052) $23,117,785 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(23,435,883) $ 439,837  $(22,996,046)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ 144,543  $ 153,785  $ 298,328 
 
 
F-14
 
 
    As of June 30, 2018  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 453,611  $ (447,599) $ 6,012 
Inventory  $ 157,318  $ (143,013) $ 14,305 
Total current assets  $ 940,183  $ (590,612) $ 349,571 
Total assets  $ 940,183  $ (590,612) $ 349,571 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 273,162  $ (141,211) $ 131,951 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ 86,500  $ 14,100  $ 100,600 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 211,843  $ (211,843) $ - 
Loans payable – related party  $ 189,828  $ 56,300  $ 246,128 
Total current liabilities  $ 761,333  $ (282,654) $ 478,679 
Total liabilities  $ 761,333  $ (282,654) $ 478,679 
Common stock  $ 184,809  $ (11,930) $ 172,879 
Additional paid-in capital  $18,629,478  $ 12,513  $18,641,991 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(18,635,437) $ (308,541) $(18,943,978)
Total stockholders’ equity (deﬁciency)  $ 178,850  $ (307,958) $ (129,108)
 
    As of June 30, 2017  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 167,546  $ (136,071) $ 31,475 
Inventory  $ 89,525  $ (10,004) $ 79,521 
Total current assets  $ 260,300  $ (146,076) $ 114,224 
Total assets  $ 260,300  $ (146,076) $ 114,224 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 481,928  $ (88,287) $ 393,641 
Liabilities for unissued shares  $ 145,543  $ (145,543) $ - 
Loans payable – related party  $ 235,078  $ 12,550  $ 247,628 
Total current liabilities  $1,075,049  $ (221,280) $ 853,769 
Total liabilities  $1,075,049  $ (221,280) $ 853,769 
Common stock  $ 153,780  $ (76) $ 153,704 
Additional paid-in capital  $11,890,131  $ 75,005  $11,965,136 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(12,858,660) $ 276  $(12,858,384)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (814,749) $ 75,205  $ (739,544)
 
    Six Months Ended June 30, 2019  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net loss  $(3,698,897) $ 228,416  $(3,470,481)
Stock based compensation  $2,723,500  $ (322,500) $2,401,000 
Amortization of debt discount  $ 156,890  $ 45,862  $ 202,752 
Accounts receivable  $ (25,009) $ 20,082  $ (4,927)
Inventory  $ (16,113) $ (9,385) $ (25,498)
Prepaid and other current assets  $ -  $ 50,000  $ 50,000 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ (8,499) $ (12,475) $ (20,974)
 
 
F-15
 
  
    Six Months Ended June 30, 2018  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Cash Flows Data (unaudited)             
Net loss  $(4,904,586) $ 83,803  $(4,820,783)
Stock based compensation  $ 674,500  $ 22,500  $ 697,000 
Loss on settlement of debt  $3,632,500  $ (123,170) $3,509,330 
Inventory  $ 6,216  $ 16,868  $ 26,084 
 
    Six Months Ended June 30, 2017  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net loss  $ (62,777) $ (139,201) $ (201,978)
Stock issued for debt ﬁnancing costs  $ -  $ 8,479  $ 8,479 
Accounts receivable  $ (61,919) $ 130,725  $ 68,806 
Inventory  $ (27,557) $ (3,447) $ (31,004)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 6,865  $ 3,444  $ 10,309 
 
   Three Months Ended March 31, 2019 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment   As
Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Selling, general and administrative expenses  $2,958,492  $ (322,499) $2,635,993 
Total operating expense  $2,985,897  $ (322,499) $2,663,398 
Loss from operations  $(2,985,897  $ (322,499) $(2,663,398)
Net loss  $(2,985,897  $ (322,499) $(2,663,398)
 
 
F-16
 
 
   Three Months Ended March 31, 2018 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 29,928  $ (10,985) $ 18,943 
Cost of goods sold  $ 8,877  $ 5,883  $ 14,760 
Gross proﬁt  $ 21,051  $ (16,868  $ 4,183 
Loss from operations  $ (357,540) $ (16,868  $ (374,408 
Loss on settlement of debt  $(3,632,500) $ 123,170  $(3,509,330 
Total other income (expense)  $(3,632,500) $ 123,170  $(3,509,330 
Net loss  $(3,990,040) $ 106,303  $(3,883,737 
 
 
   Three Months Ended March 31, 2017 
   As
Previously         
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Statement of Operations Data (unaudited):             
Revenues  $ 227,129  $ (130,725) $ 96,404 
Gross proﬁt  $ 211,747  $ (130,725) $ 81,022 
Gain (loss) from operations  $ 61,993  $ (130,725) $ (68,732)
Interest expense  $ (10,000) $ (5,625) $ (15,625)
Total other income (expense)  $ (10,000) $ (5,625) $ (15,625)
Net income (loss)  $ 51,993  $ (136,350) $ (84,357)
 
 
    As of March 31, 2019  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 11,010  $ (11,010) $ - 
Inventory  $ 83,694  $ (51,713) $ 31,981 
Prepaid and other current assets  $ -  $ 50,000  $ 50,000 
Total current assets  $ 101,014  $ (12,723) $ 88,291 
Total assets  $ 101,014  $ (12,723) $ 88,291 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 240,147  $ (83,288) $ 156,859 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ 70,000  $ 4,100  $ 74,100 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 201,843  $ (201,843) $ - 
Loans payable – related party  $ 129,121  $ 66,300  $ 195,421 
Total current liabilities  $ 641,111  $ (214,730) $ 426,381 
Total liabilities  $ 641,111  $ (214,730) $ 426,381 
Additional paid-in capital  $22,008,293  $ (331,915) $21,676,378 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(22,722,883) $ 533,921  $(22,188,962)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (540,097) $ 202,007  $ (338,090)
 
 
F-17
 
  
    As of March 31, 2018  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 451,810  $ (447,599) $ 4,211 
Inventory  $ 157,538  $ (143,011) $ 14,527 
Total current assets  $ 781,128  $ (590,610) $ 190,518 
Total assets  $ 781,128  $ (590,610) $ 190,518 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities  $ 298,162  $ (141,211) $ 156,951 
Accrued liabilities – related party  $ 86,500  $ 14,100  $ 100,600 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 298,843  $ (298,843) $ - 
Loans payable – related party  $ 198,328  $ 56,300  $ 254,628 
Total current liabilities  $ 881,833  $ (369,653) $ 512,180 
Total liabilities  $ 881,833  $ (369,653) $ 512,180 
Common stock  $ 183,173  $ (11,856) $ 171,317 
Additional paid-in capital  $17,437,013  $ 76,940  $17,513,953 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(17,720,891) $ (286,040) $(18,006,931)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (100,705) $ (220,956) $ (321,661)
 
    As of March 31, 2017  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
              
Balance Sheet Data (unaudited):             
Accounts receivable  $ 234,214  $ (136,072) $ 98,142 
Inventory  $ 62,039  $ (10,005) $ 52,034 
Total current assets  $ 311,468  $ (146,077) $ 165,391 
Total assets  $ 311,468  $ (146,077) $ 165,391 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 458,576  $ (88,288) $ 370,288 
Liability for unissued shares  $ 145,543  $ (145,543) $ - 
Loans payable -related party  $ 182,328  $ 12,550  $ 194,878 
Total current liabilities  $1,011,447  $ (221,281) $ 790,166 
Total liabilities  $1,011,447  $ (221,281) $ 790,166 
Common stock  $ 153,780  $ (114) $ 153,666 
Additional paid-in capital  $11,890,131  $ 72,189  $11,962,320 
Accumulated deﬁcit  $(12,743,890) $ 3,129  $(12,740,761)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency  $ (699,979) $ 75,204  $ (624,775)
 
 
F-18
 
 
   Three Months Ended March 31, 2019 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Consolidated Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net loss  $(2,985,897)   322,500  $(2,663,397)
Stock based compensation  $2,723,500    (322,500) $2,401,000 
 
   Three Months Ended March 31, 2018  
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Consolidated Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net loss  $(3,990,040) $  106,304  $(3,883,736)
Loss on settlement of debt  $ 3,632,500  $ (123,170) $ 3,509,330 
Inventory  $ 5,997  $  16,866  $ 22,863 
 
   Three Months Ended March 31, 2017 
   As
Previously       
   Reported  Adjustment  As Restated 
Consolidated Cash Flows Data (unaudited):             
Net income (loss)  $ 51,993  $ (136,348) $ (84,355)
Shares issued for debt ﬁnancing costs  $ -  $ 5,625  $ 5,625 
Accounts receivable  $ (128,587) $ 130,726  $ 2,139 
Inventory  $ (71) $ (3,446) $ (3,517)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ (16,487) $ 3,443  $ (13,044 
 
 
F-19
 
 
Note 3. Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies
 
Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue as a going concern. The
Company has incurred recurring net losses, has negative working capital and operations have not provided cash ﬂows. Additionally, the
Company does not currently have suﬃcient revenue producing operations to cover its operating expenses and meet its current obligations.
In view of these matters, there is substantial doubt about the Company’s ability to continue as a going concern. The Company intends on
ﬁnancing its future development activities and its working capital needs largely from the sale of public equity securities with some
additional funding from other traditional ﬁnancing sources, including term notes until such time that funds provided by operations are
suﬃcient to fund working capital requirements. The ﬁnancial statements of the Company do not include any adjustments relating to the
recoverability and classiﬁcation of recorded assets, or the amounts and classiﬁcations of liabilities that might be necessary should the
Company be unable to continue as a going concern.
 
The Chief Executive Oﬃcer has agreed to advance funds or make payments of the Company’s obligations at his discretion. There is
no written agreement to continue this support.
 
Use of Estimates
 
The preparation of ﬁnancial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles requires the Company’s
management to make estimates and assumptions that aﬀect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities at the date of the ﬁnancial
statements and the reported amounts of income and expenses during the reported period. Changes in the economic environment, ﬁnancial
markets, as well as in the healthcare industry, and any other parameters used in determining these estimates, could cause actual results to
diﬀer.
 
Cash and Cash Equivalents
 
The Company considers all highly liquid debt investments purchased with a maturity of three months or less to be cash equivalents.
 
 
F-20
 
 
Fair Value Measurements
 
Accounting principles generally accepted in the United States deﬁne fair value as the exchange price that would be received for an
asset or paid to transfer a liability (an exit price) in the principal or most advantageous market for the asset or liability in an orderly
transaction between market participants at the measurement date. Additionally, the inputs used to measure fair value are prioritized based
on a three-level hierarchy. This hierarchy requires entities to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable
inputs. The three levels of inputs used to measure fair value are as follows:
 
Level 1 — Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
 
Level 2 — Observable inputs other than quoted prices included in Level 1. We value assets and liabilities included in this level using
dealer and broker quotations, bid prices, quoted prices for similar assets and liabilities in active markets, or other inputs that are
observable or can be corroborated by observable market data.
 
Level 3 — Unobservable inputs that are supported by little or no market activity and that are signiﬁcant to the fair value of the
assets or liabilities. This includes certain pricing models, discounted cash ﬂow methodologies and similar techniques that use signiﬁcant
unobservable inputs.
 
Fair value estimates discussed herein are based upon certain market assumptions and pertinent information available to
management as of December 31, 2019 and 2018. The respective carrying value of certain on-balance-sheet ﬁnancial instruments
approximated their fair values due to the short-term nature of these instruments.
 
Income Taxes
 
The Company accounts for income taxes using a method that requires recognition of deferred tax assets and liabilities for expected
future tax consequences of temporary diﬀerences that currently exist between tax bases and ﬁnancial reporting bases of the Company’s
assets and liabilities which is commonly known as the asset and liability method. In assessing the ability to realize deferred tax assets, the
Company considers whether it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized.
 
The Company evaluates its tax positions taken or expected to be taken in the course of preparing the Company’s tax returns to
determine whether the tax positions are ‘‘more-likely-than-not’’ of being sustained by the applicable tax authority. Tax positions not
deemed to meet the “more-likely-than-not” threshold are recorded as an expense in the applicable year. The Company does not have a
liability for any unrecognized tax beneﬁts. Management’s evaluation of uncertain tax positions may be subject to review and adjustment at
a later date based upon factors including, but not limited to, an on-going analysis of tax laws, regulations and interpretations thereof, with
due consideration given to the fact that tax periods are open to examination by tax authorities. The Company is no longer subject to U.S
federal or state income tax examinations by tax authorities before 2015.
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the Company has approximately $15.6, $13.5 and $12.2 million of net operating loss
carry-forwards, respectively, available to aﬀect future taxable income and has established a valuation allowance equal to the tax beneﬁt of
the net operating loss carry forwards and temporary diﬀerences as realization of the asset is not assured.
 
Trade Accounts Receivable and Concentration Risk
 
We record accounts receivable at the invoiced amount and we do not charge interest. We review the accounts receivable by amounts
due from customers which are past due, to identify speciﬁc customers with known disputes or collectability issues. In determining the
amount of the reserve, we make judgments about the creditworthiness of signiﬁcant customers based on ongoing credit evaluations. We
will also maintain a sales allowance to reserve for potential credits issued to customers. We will determine the amount of the reserve
based on historical credits issued.
 
There was no provision for doubtful accounts recorded at December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017. The Company recorded $0 in bad debt
expense for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017.
  
 
F-21
 
 
For the year ended December 31, 2019 one customer accounted for 100% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2018 there were two customers accounted for 61% and 28% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2017 one customer accounted for 85% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
Inventory
 
Inventory is valued at the lower of cost or market using the ﬁrst-in, ﬁrst-out (FIFO) method. Inventory on the balance sheet consists
of raw materials purchased by the Company and ﬁnished goods.
 
   December
31,
2019  December
31,
2018  December
31,
2017 
Raw materials  $ 54,774  $ 27,302  $ 31,250 
Finished goods    22,074    4,678    6,141 
   $ 76,848  $ 31,980  $ 37,391 
 
During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the Company determined that no inventory needed to be impaired and
written-oﬀ to cost of goods sold.
  
As mentioned above in Note 2, the Company shipped product to a customer at the end of 2017 and in light of the information
currently available to the Company, the Company determined that no revenue should be recognized due to the customer disputing the
shipment and refusing to pay the amount owed and therefore the transaction did not meet all of the revenue recognition criteria under ASC
606. The Company determined the inventory related to that shipment should be written down to $0 and expensed. Accordingly, the
Company recorded a loss of $82,166 to loss on disputed inventory in the Statement of Operations during the year ended December 31,
2017.
  
Advertising and Marketing Costs
 
Advertising and marketing costs are expensed as incurred. The Company incurred $214,810, $176,999 and $53,050 in advertising
and marketing costs during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
 
Shipping and Handling Costs
 
The Company includes shipping and handling cost as part of cost of goods sold.
 
Research and Development
 
The Company charges research and development costs to expense when incurred. The Company incurred $666,388, $76,951 and
$19,936 in research and development expenses during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
 
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company accounts for share-based compensation under the provisions of ASC 718, Compensation-Stock Compensation. Under
the fair value recognition provisions, stock-based compensation expense is measured at the fair value of the consideration received, or the
fair value of the equity instruments issued, or liabilities incurred, whichever is more reliably measured. Share-based compensation for all
stock-based awards to employees and directors is recognized as an expense over the requisite service period, which is generally the
vesting period.
 
The Company accounted for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with ASC 505-50-30-11, until
January 1, 2019, which provides that an issuer shall measure the fair value of the equity instruments in these transactions using the stock
price and other measurement assumptions as of the earlier of the following dates, referred to as the measurement date:
 
 i. The date at which a commitment for performance by the counterparty to earn the equity instruments is reached (a performance
commitment); and
  ii.The date at which the counterparty’s performance is complete.
 
As of January 1, 2019, the Company accounted for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with
Accounting Standard Update (ASU) 2018-07, Compensation—Stock Compensation (Topic 718): Improvements to Nonemployee Share-Based
Payment Accounting, which requires that such equity instruments are recorded at the value on the grant date.
 
 
F-22
 
    
Per Share Information
 
Basic earnings per share are calculated using the weighted average number of common shares outstanding for the period presented.
Diluted earnings per share is computed using the weighted-average number of common shares and, if dilutive, potential common shares
outstanding during the period. The dilutive eﬀect of potential common shares is not reﬂected in diluted earnings per share because the
Company incurred a net loss for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 and the eﬀect of including these potential common
shares in the net loss per share calculations would be anti-dilutive.
 
The total potential common shares as of December 31, 2019 include 50,100,000 of restricted stock units, and 579,556 shares for
convertible loans payable – related party. There were no potential common shares as of December 31, 2018 and 2017.
  
New Accounting Pronouncements, Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
 
Revenue Recognition
 
During the year ended December 31, 2017, the Company recognized revenue per ASC 605 – Revenue Recognition.  Under ASC 605
revenue was recognized when persuasive evidence of an arrangement existed, product had been delivered or services had been rendered,
the price was ﬁxed or determinable and collectability was reasonably assured. Revenue was recognized net of estimated sales returns and
allowances.
 
Eﬀective January 1, 2018, the Company adopted ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers. Under ASC 606, the Company
recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by applying the following steps: (1) identify the contract with a customer; (2)
identify the performance obligations in the contract; (3) determine the transaction price; (4) allocate the transaction price to each
performance obligation in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each performance obligation is satisﬁed.
 
The Company receives orders for its HemoStyp products directly from its customers. Revenues are recognized based on the agreed
upon sales or transaction price with the customer when control of the promised goods are transferred to the customer.  The transfer of
goods to the customer and satisfaction of the Company’s performance obligation will occur either at the time when products are shipped or
when the products arrive and are received by the customer.  The Company provided a 3% net 30 discount to one of its customers. No other
discounts were oﬀered by the Company. The Company does not provide an estimate for returns as there is no anticipation for any returns in
the normal course of business.
 
The standard became eﬀective for the Company beginning January 1, 2018 and permits two methods of adoption: the full
retrospective method, which requires the standard to be applied to each prior period presented, or the modiﬁed retrospective method,
which requires the cumulative eﬀect of adoption to be recognized as an adjustment to opening retained earnings in the period of adoption.
The Company adopted the standard using the modiﬁed retrospective method. There was no eﬀect for any adjustments to retained earnings
upon adoption of the standard on January 1, 2018.
    
The Company considers all new pronouncements and management has determined that there have been no other recently adopted
or issued accounting standards that had or will have a material impact on its ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-23
 
  
Note 4. Related Party Transactions
 
Related party loans and related party convertible loans payables
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, loans payable to related parties totaled $0, $74,421 and $324,628, respectively. These
amounts are owed to Doug Beplate, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018, 2017, convertible loans payable - related parties totaled $365,785, $0 and $0, respectively. These
amounts are owed to Doug Beplate, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate advanced the Company a total of $657,500 and the Company made
repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling $161,135. These loans were for operating expenses of the Company, are due on demand and have no
interest rate.
 
On April 22, 2019, the Company agreed to allow Mr. Beplate to convert all previous outstanding cash loans made to the Company. For
any outstanding loans made on or before April 15, 2019, the loans are convertible at $0.50 per share and for all loans subsequent to April
15, 2019, the amounts are convertible at $0.65 per share, in each case at the sole discretion of Mr. Beplate. The Company’s stock price on
April 22, 2019 was $0.90 which resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $193,137 which was recorded to interest expense.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate converted $205,000 of loans payable at a conversion price of $0.50 into
410,000 shares of common stock.
 
From the April 15, 2019 through December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $490,500 which were convertible at $0.65 as
mentioned above. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $315,046 which was recorded to interest expense upon
issuance. The outstanding balance of convertible loans payable – related party was $365,785, $0 and $0 as of December 31, 2019, 2018
and 2017, respectively. There is $0 remaining as unamortized debt discount.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, Mr. Beplate gave a personal vehicle to an employee of the Company valued at $30,000 in
lieu of the Company paying travel expenses and consulting expenses. During 2018, Mr. Beplate provided loans to the Company of $15,000
and was repaid $295,207 of the outstanding loans payable balance. During the year ended December 31, 2017, Mr. Beplate provided loans
to the Company of $155,250 and was repaid $21,500. These loans were for operating expenses of the Company, are due on demand and
have no interest rate.
 
Accrued liabilities
 
As of December 31, 2017, $76,500 was owed to him for accrued compensation. During the year ended December 31, 2018, Mr.
Beplate received compensation of $180,000 and $71,500 of previously accrued compensation was paid, leaving a balance of $5,000. During
the year ended December 31, 2019, $75,000 of compensation was accrued and $2,870 of previously accrued compensation was paid
leaving a balance of $77,130.
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, $24,100 was owed to Nate Knight, the Chief Financial Oﬃcer, for accrued compensation.
   
 
F-24
 
   
Equity transactions
   
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight who is the Chief Financial Oﬃcer of
the Company, 500,000 shares issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO, 5,000,000 shares to the
Chief Operating Oﬃcer (which were later cancelled and replaced with restricted stock units (RSU’s) as described below) and 50,000 shares
to a Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator. These shares, were placed in escrow and were to be released
when a change of control occurred. Management was unable to determine when a change of control would occur and $0 was expensed as
of December 31, 2018.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight who is the Chief Financial Oﬃcer of the Company,
500,000 shares to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product
Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator, all of which were held in escrow as of December 31, 2018 became vested as modiﬁed
by the Board of Directors for services provided. Per ASC 718-20-35, the change in vesting conditions resulted in a modiﬁcation of the stock-
based compensation awards. The modiﬁcation is considered a Type III modiﬁcation as described in ASC 718-20-55 and resulted in recording
$2,021,000 of stock-based compensation expense which was the fair value of the shares on the date of the modiﬁcation.
  
In March 2019, the Company granted Mr. Beplate and Louis Schiliro 33,000,000 and 8,000,000 Restricted Stock Units (RSU’s),
respectively, which vest and are issuable upon the achievement of certain conditions described in Note 4. These RSU’s were included as
part of the Company’s grant of an aggregate of 50,100,000 RSUs to various oﬃcers, directors and consultants which all vest on
substantially the same terms. The RSUs granted to Mr. Beplate replaced an executive compensation stock bonus package that was granted
to Mr. Beplate in December 2018 which had provided that upon the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or other
change in control or merger transaction in which the Company is involved, or in the event that no such transaction occurred by December
31, 2019, Mr. Beplate would have been entitled to receive a number of shares equal to 15% post issuance of the then outstanding shares of
the Company’s common stock on a fully diluted basis. The December 2018 executive compensation stock bonus package had, in turn,
replaced a previously issued 5% stock bonus granted to Mr. Beplate that would have been issuable in the event of a sale of the Company’s
assets or change in control or merger transaction, per his services agreement. The 8,000,000 RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro replaced the
5,000,000 shares of common stock which were previously held in escrow and subsequently cancelled. See “Note 6” regarding the granting
of the RSUs.
  
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the Company issued a total of 1,000,000 shares of common stock to directors and
oﬃcers of the Company and 50,000 shares of common stock to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO
and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator for services rendered. The shares had a fair
market value of $1,063,000.
   
Note 5. Prepaid and Other Current Assets
 
The Company had a balance of $50,000 as of December 31, 2018 related to a retainer payment for professional services. The
$50,000 retainer was refunded to the Company during 2019.
  
Note 6. Issuances of Securities
 
Share issuances 2017
 
In 2017, the Company sold 7,047,820 shares of its common stock in a private placement oﬀering for gross proceeds of $644,000.
Exemption from registration is claimed under Rule 506 of Regulation D of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
During 2017, in conjunction with issuing three notes payable, the Company agreed to issue a total of 113,000 shares of common
stock. These shares had a fair market value of $8,479 and were considered ﬁnancing costs and recorded as interest expense.
 
During 2017, the Company issued 1,700,000 shares of stock with a fair value of $429,000 to settle accounts payable balances of
$82,774. The Company recorded $346,226 as loss on settlement of debt.
  
During 2017, the Company’s securities counsel converted $162,500 in accounts payable to a promissory note. The securities counsel
then converted this promissory note into 2,500,000 shares of common stock. The shares of stock had a fair value of $235,000 and the
Company recorded $72,500 as loss on settlement of debt.
 
In December 2017, the Company issued 200,000 shares of common stock to an unaﬃliated individual for services performed. The
shares had a total fair market value of $144,000.
  
 
F-25
 
 
Share issuances 2018
 
The Company issued 800,000 shares of common stock to its medical advisors with a total fair market value of $642,500 for services,
50,000 shares of common stock to an unaﬃliated individual with a total fair market value of $54,500 for services, 2,403,728 shares of
common stock were sold for total proceeds of $1,415,200.
 
The Company issued 3,387,000 shares of common stock to non-aﬃliated investors to convert $172,500 of notes payable and
$10,000 of accrued interest. The shares were valued at their fair market value of $1.09 which resulted in a loss on debt settlement of
$3,509,330. See “Note 8” below.
 
The Company issued a total of 14,150,000 shares of common stock to oﬃcers and various consultants for services to be provided
related to a change of control of the Company and placed in escrow The Company canceled 12,000,000 of these shares in the ﬁrst quarter
of 2019, therefore only 2,150,000 of the shares were treated as issued and outstanding in 2018. The shares were to be released from
escrow upon the change of control of the Company. Management was unable to determine when a change of control would occur therefore
$0 was expensed as of December 31, 2018 related to these shares.
  
Share issuances 2019
 
During 2019, 1,622,199 shares of common stock were sold to non-aﬃliated investors in a private placement for total cash proceeds
of $1,055,750: 400,000 shares of common stock were sold to securities counsel for total cash proceeds of $200,000: 350,000 shares of
common stock were issued to securities counsel for services rendered with a fair value of $335,500: 1,100,000 shares of common stock
were issued to oﬃcers and directors of the Company for services rendered with a fair value of $1,063,000: 50,000 shares of common stock
to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO, for services rendered with a fair value of $48,500: 425,000
shares of common stock were issued to various consultants and advisors for services rendered with a fair value of $412,250: and 410,000
shares of common stock were issued to the Company’s CEO for conversion of notes payable totaling $205,000. 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the previously disclosed 2,150,000 shares that were awarded in 2018 (see Note 4 above)
and reported as issued and outstanding with no related expense recognized as of December 31, 2018, were modiﬁed by the Board of
Directors and deemed vested. The modiﬁcation resulted in recording $2,021,000 of stock-based compensation expense which was the fair
value of the shares on the date of the modiﬁcation.
 
Restricted stock units
 
The Board approved Restricted Stock Unit Agreements (“RSU Agreements”) with certain of its oﬃcers, directors and consultants
representing an aggregate of 50,100,000 shares of common stock to be issued and delivered to such persons upon the earlier of (i) a
change in control of the Company by a cash tender oﬀer, merger, acquisition or otherwise or (ii) the Company achieving quarterly gross
revenue that, when annualized, represents gross annual revenues of at least $20,000,000 by December 31, 2019, or (iii) the
commencement of an action or event by a third party without the Board’s approval to eﬀect, or seek to eﬀect, a change in control of the
Company or change in the Company’s management.
 
Activity related to our restricted stock units during the year ended December 31, 2019 was as follows:
 
   
Number of
Units  Weighted
Average
Grant
Date Fair
Value 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2018    -  $ - 
Units granted   50,100,000  $ 0.94 
Units Exercised/Released    -  $ - 
Units Cancelled/Forfeited    -  $ - 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2019   50,100,000  $ 0.94 
 
Management is unable to determine when a change of control will occur and as of December 31, 2019, there was $47,094,000 of
unrecognized compensation cost related to unvested restricted stock unit awards.
  
 
F-26
 
   
Note 7. Litigation
 
A Complaint was ﬁled with the United States District Court, Southern District of New York by Steven Safran as Plaintiﬀ against the
Company and Douglas Beplate, its CEO, as Defendant. This court case was transferred to the United States District Court in Las Vegas,
Nevada. Mr. Safran is seeking damages and monies allegedly owed pursuant to an employment agreement of approximately $734,000 and
allegedly unpaid loans of $245,824 provided to Defendants. The Company has denied Plaintiﬀ’s allegations and intends to vigorously
defend said lawsuit. The parties have held various depositions and the Company had a motion to dismiss which was denied. The Plaintiﬀ
ﬁled a motion to amend his complaint and the Company has submitted opposition papers and are awaiting an order from the Court.
   
In July 2015, the Company entered into a consulting agreement retaining the services of Maxim Group LLC. An amended agreement
was executed in January 2018. A total of 4 million shares of common stock were issued to Maxim in exchange for its obligation to perform
certain advisory and other services. In the fourth quarter of 2018, the Company notiﬁed Maxim of its intent to ﬁle for arbitration pursuant to
the consulting agreement. Maxim, without providing a similar notice to the Company, immediately ﬁled a complaint with FINRA seeking
release of a restrictive legend from a Company stock certiﬁcate in the amount of 500,000 shares. The Company ﬁled an aﬃrmative defense
that the required notice of arbitration was not provided to the Company prior to ﬁling. The Company also ﬁled a counterclaim for breach of
contract seeking restitution of the original 4 million shares issued to Maxim. This case was settled on December 13, 2019, with Maxim
agreeing to make certain payments to the Company post sale of their 500,000 Company shares, in an amount equal to one-half of their
sales proceeds. To date, the Company has received no money.
 
During 2018, a vendor ﬁled a judgement against the Company related disputed invoices. The Company paid $15,000 to settle the
judgement in full during the year ended December 31, 2018.
 
Philip Forman, who served in positions as Chairman, a director, Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical Advisor at various time
between 2011 and October 2015, ﬁled a lawsuit against the Company and our Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in the United States
District Court of the District of Nevada. The claimant is claiming, among other things, that: the June 25, 2015 Amendment to his November
10, 2014 Employment Agreement with the Company, which terminated the Employment Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not valid
because of lack of consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the claimant sold Company shares
issued to him under the Amendment to a third a party is unenforceable (despite the fact that all payment for the shares under the Stock
Purchase Agreement was made); that the plaintiﬀ’s 2014 Employment Agreement is enforceable and that he is entitled to cash and stock
compensation under that Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment); that if the Amendment is enforceable, he is
entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that those shares were sold to a third party under the Stock Purchase
Agreement described above); and that the Company and Mr. Beplate defrauded the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking
declaratory judgment regarding the parties’ relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase
Agreement; money damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The Company believes that it has
meritorious defenses to the matters claimed as well as counterclaims against the claimant. A motion to dismiss the plaintiﬀ’s claims was
ﬁled and on March 19, 2020 the motion to dismiss was denied. Discovery is now taking place.
   
FSR Inc. commenced a lawsuit in 2018 against Korsair Holdings A.G. in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York,
seeking among other claims for relief, rescission of the transfer of 3,050,000 shares of United Health Products that FSR sold to Korsair in
2011. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ, JEC Consulting Associates, LLC as Liquidator of LeadDog Capital L.P., Intervenor (“Intervenor”) in the above
matter, ﬁled a third-party complaint against United Health Products, and Douglas Beplate alleging among other things that the Company
and Mr. Beplate refused to have the Rule 144 restrictive legend removed from the Korsair certiﬁcate held by JEC, and concomitantly
fraudulently deprive JEC as Liquidator of LeadDog of the ability to sell the Shares in the open market, knowingly, intentionally and directly
causing economic harm to LeadDog Capital L.P. Intervenor as Third Party Plaintiﬀ further alleges that the Company and Mr. Beplate as Third-
Party Defendants are not only monetarily liable to Third-Party Plaintiﬀ for compensatory damages of $2,500,000 but should be made to pay
exemplary damages in an amount determined by the Court, but not less than an equal amount - $2,500,000. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ demands
judgment for the above referenced amounts and for the Court to also declare that the 3,050,000 shares are free trading; that Third-Party
Plaintiﬀ’s rights to 2.5 million of the Shares are superior to the claims of Plaintiﬀ FSR; that Plaintiﬀ FSR has no claim to 2.5 million of the
3,050,000 Shares reﬂected by the Korsair certiﬁcate; that the Company and Mr. Beplate are to instruct its current transfer agent to remove
the restrictive legend on the Korsair certiﬁcate for the Shares; and an order directing the Company and Mr. Beplate to instruct the
Company’s transfer agent to exchange the Korsair certiﬁcate for new free-trading, unrestricted certiﬁcates. The Company believes that it
had legal right to decline to instruct the transfer agent to remove the restrictive legend from the Korsair Shares where the ownership of the
aforementioned shares have been in dispute and the Korsair shares have not been submitted for transfer to its transfer agent in proper
form under the uniform commercial code. Recently, the Court granted the motion for a default by FSR, Inc against Korsair Holdings, AG., but
denied any claim for relief against UHP, Inc. The Court ruled that the SEC must review the claim before the matter can proceed in Court.
 
Due to uncertainties inherent in litigation, we cannot predict the outcome of the above legal proceedings.
 
In October 2019 the Company ﬁled a defamation, trade libel and unlawful and deceptive practices lawsuit against White Diamond
Research LLC, Adam Gefvert, Streetsweeper.org, Sonya Colberg and others in response to a stock manipulation scheme to injure UHP for
illegitimate personal gain. The complaint alleged that in August 2019 the above defendants published false and defamatory statements
about UHP in “short and distort” schemes to artiﬁcially drive down the market price of UHP’s common stock while at the same time having
a short position in UHP’s stock, so they could obtain illicit proﬁts on their short sale positions. This lawsuit was settled in April 2020 on
terms mutually agreed to by the Company and the defendant parties, without the exchange of monetary payment or other economic
consideration. 
 
 
F-27
 
 
Note 8. Notes Payable
 
During the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company received $150,000 related to a note payable. The note was due on
December 11, 2018 and interest accrued at the rate of 10% per annum. During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued
2,500,000 shares of common stock to settle the outstanding note payable balance of $150,000 and accrued interest of $15,000. The
balance of this note was $0, $0 and $150,000 as of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2017, the Company received a total of $75,000 related to three separate notes payable. One
note payable for $50,000 had a maturity date of March 31, 2017 and the other two notes totaling $25,000 had maturity dates of May 15,
2017. The notes accrued interest at the rate of 20% per annum and as consideration for entering into the notes, the Company agreed to
issue 113,000 shares of common stock, which were recorded as issued and outstanding in 2017. The shares of common stock had a fair
market value of $8,479 and were considered ﬁnancing costs and recorded as interest expense during the year ended December 31, 2017.
 
The Company also paid down $42,500 of the principal balance during 2017 and $12,500 of accrued interest leaving a balance of
$32,500 and $0 as the principal and interest amounts owing, respectively, as of December 31, 2017. During the year ended December 31,
2018, the Company paid $15,000 of the balance of the outstanding note payable principal balance and issued 887,000 shares of common
stock to settle the remaining balance of $17,500. The balance was $0, $0 and $32,500 as of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
 
The Company borrowed $35,000 in April 2017 related to a note payable, with original issue discount of $3,500. The note was paid oﬀ
in full in May 2017.
     
Note 9. Income Tax
 
The Company accounts for income taxes under the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) Accounting Standards Codiﬁcation
(“ASC”) No. 740, Income Taxes (“ASC 740”). Under ASC 740, deferred tax assets and liabilities are recognized for the future tax
consequences attributable to diﬀerences between the ﬁnancial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their
respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the
years in which those temporary diﬀerences are expected to be recovered or settled. Under ASC 740, the eﬀect on deferred tax assets and
liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes the enactment date.
 
On December 22, 2017, the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the Tax Act) was enacted into law including a one-time mandatory transition
tax on accumulated foreign earnings and a reduction of the corporate income tax rate to 21% eﬀective January 1, 2018, among others. We
are required to recognize the eﬀect of the tax law changes in the period of enactment, such as determining the transition tax, remeasuring
our U.S. deferred tax assets and liabilities as well as reassessing the net realizability of our deferred tax assets and liabilities. The
Company does not have any foreign earnings and therefore, we do not anticipate any impact of a transition tax. We have remeasured our
U.S. deferred tax assets at a statutory income tax rate of 21%.
  
The Company did not take any uncertain tax positions and had no adjustments to its income tax liabilities or beneﬁts pursuant to the
provisions of Section 740-10-25 for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 or 2017.The Company recognizes interest accrued related to
unrecognized tax beneﬁts in interest expense and penalties in operating expenses. No such interest or penalties were recognized during the
period presented. The Company had no accruals for interest and penalties at December 31, 2019.
 
 
F-28
 
  
The Company’s federal income tax returns for the years ended December 31, 2016 through December 31, 2019 remain subject to
examination by the Internal Revenue Service as of December 31, 2019.
 
During 2019, 2018 and 2017, the Company incurred net losses and, therefore, has no tax liability. The net deferred tax asset
generated by the loss carry-forward has been fully reserved.
 
Net deferred tax assets consist of the following components as of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017.
 
    December 31,  
   2019  2018  2017 
Deferred tax assets:             
Net operating loss carryover  $3,282,100  $2,832,800  $2,566,600 
Accrued related party payroll    21,700    6,100    21,100 
Valuation allowance   (3,303,800)  (2,838,900)  (2,587,700)
Net deferred tax asset  $ -  $ -  $ - 
 
The income tax provision diﬀers from the amount on income tax determined by applying the U.S. federal income tax rate to pretax
income from continuing operations for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 due to the following:
 
    December 31,  
   2019  2018  2017 
Book income  $(1,386,500) $(1,134,500) $(308,000)
Related party accrued payroll    15,500   (15,000)   21,200 
Loss on debt settlement    -   737,000    87,500 
Stock based compensation   814,900   146,400    30,200 
Interest amortization   106,700    -    1,800 
Valuation allowance   449,400   266,100   167,300 
Income tax expense  $ -  $ -  $ - 
       
As of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the Company has taxable net loss carryovers of approximately $15.6 million, $13.5
million and $12.2 million, respectively.
  
Note 10. Subsequent Events
 
The Company has evaluated events from December 31, 2019, through the date whereupon the ﬁnancial statements were issued and
has determined that there are no other material events that need to be disclosed, except as follows:
 
   1,653,119 shares of common stock were sold for cash proceeds of $765,446 and issued to various non-aﬃliated investors at
$0.50 per share to $0.90 a share.
 
50,000 shares of common stock with a fair market value of $50,000 were issued to a former medical advisor and 125,000 shares
of common stock were issued for services with a fair market value of $100,625 to a consultant.
     
   The Company received a total $380,230 in loans. $130,230 was received from the Company's Chief Executive Oﬃcer, $50,000
was received from the Company's Chief Operating Oﬃcer and $200,000 was received from a non-related party.
 
On February 7, 2020, the Company ﬁled the Original Petition for Fraud and Breach of Contract in the 215th Judicial District of
Harris County. The demand for trial by jury was made. Defendants Patterson Companies Inc., and Patterson Management, L.P.,
were served on February 24, 2020. Defendants Patterson Veterinary, Inc. and Patterson Logistics Services, Inc. were served on
February 25, 2020. Defendant Animal Health was served on February 27, 2020. On March 5, 2020, the Defendants removed to
federal court. The defendants ﬁled their answer in federal court on March 12, 2020. An “initial pretrial and schedule conference”
is set before the Magistrate Judge on August 25, 2020. Discovery is ongoing.
    
 
F-29
  
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
 
On December 17, 2019 (the “Resignation Date”) Haynie & Company resigned as the independent registered public accounting ﬁrm
for the Company. On December 20, 2019, the Company engaged MAC Accounting Group, LLP (“MAC”), Salt Lake City, Utah, as its new
independent registered public accounting ﬁrm. The change of the Company’s independent registered public accounting ﬁrm from Haynie &
Company to MAC was approved unanimously by our board of directors.
 
During the Company’s two most recent ﬁscal years and in the subsequent interim period through the Resignation Date, the Company
has not consulted with MAC regarding either (i) the application of accounting principles to a speciﬁed transaction, either completed or
proposed, or the type of audit opinion that might be rendered on the Company’s consolidated ﬁnancial statements, and neither a written
report nor oral advice was provided to the Company that Haynie & Company concluded was an important factor considered by the
Company in reaching a decision as to the accounting, auditing or ﬁnancial reporting issue; or (ii) any matter that was either the subject of a
disagreement (as deﬁned in Item 304(a)(1)(iv) of Regulation S-K and the related instructions) or a reportable event (as described in Item
304(a)(1)(v) of Regulation S-K). 
 
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
 
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
 
The Company needs to implement disclosure controls and procedures (as deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 (the ‘‘Exchange Act’’), that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed in the Company’s
Exchange Act reports are recorded, processed, summarized, and reported within the time periods speciﬁed in the rules and forms of the
Securities and Exchange Commission, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief
Financial Oﬃcer to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
 
As of December 31, 2019, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer carried out an assessment, of the eﬀectiveness of
the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures pursuant to Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(b) and 15d-15(b). As of the date
of this assessment, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer concluded that the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures
were not eﬀective as of December 31, 2019.
 
 
24
 
    
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
Management of the Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, as
such term is deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act. The Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a
process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements
for external reporting purposes in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Internal control
over ﬁnancial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail,
accurately and fairly reﬂect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that
transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use,
or disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material eﬀect on the interim or annual ﬁnancial statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of
changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
The Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer assessed the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting as of December 31, 2019. In performing its assessment of the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting, management applied the criteria described in the Internal Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (‘‘COSO - 2013’’).
 
A material weakness is a deﬁciency, or a combination of deﬁciencies, in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, such that there is a
reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of the Company’s annual or interim ﬁnancial statements will not be prevented or
detected on a timely basis.
 
The material weaknesses identiﬁed during management’s assessment were the following:
 
  · Inadequate corporate governance
    
  · Inadequate internal control structure and control environment
    
  · Lack of information technology controls
    
  · Lack of segregation of duties
    
 · Lack of suﬃcient accounting resources with SEC experience, US generally accepted accounting principles knowledge and tax
accounting expertise
 
These material weaknesses could result in a material misstatement of signiﬁcant accounts or disclosures that would result in a
material misstatement to the Company’s interim or annual ﬁnancial statements that would not be prevented or detected. The Company’s
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2019, has been audited by MAC Accounting Group, LLP as stated in their report
which appears herein.
 
Because of the material weaknesses, management concluded that the Company did not maintain eﬀective internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on the criteria in Internal Control-Integrated Framework issued by COSO -2013.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There were no reported changes in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting for the year ended December 31, 2019.
 
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
 
None.
 
 
25
 
   
PART III
 
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS, AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
 
Directors and Executive Oﬃcers
 
Our directors and executive oﬃcers of the Company as of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K are as follows:
 
Name   Age   Position with Company  
Douglas K. Beplate    64   Chief Executive and Chairman of the Board  
Louis Schiliro    49   Chief Operating Oﬃcer  
Nate Knight    68   Chief Financial Oﬃcer, Secretary, Treasurer and Director  
Robert Denser    49   Director  
 
Our directors hold oﬃce for one-year terms and until their successors have been elected and qualiﬁed. Our oﬃcers are elected
annually by the board of directors and serve at the discretion of the Board.
 
Douglas K. Beplate, Chief Executive Oﬃcer of the Company since November 2014 and Chief Operating Oﬃcer of the Company
since November 2013. Mr. Beplate became a director and Chairman of the Board of the Company in 2015. Mr. Beplate has been working on
the development and marketing of the Hemostyp gauze since 2010. Mr.Beplate’s present responsibilities include daily operations and
oversight of sales, marketing, product development and intellectual property. From 1996 to 2007, Mr. Beplate was founder and President of
Emergency Filtration Products, Inc. (EFP) where his responsibilities included product design, research and development, patent work and
production. During his time at EFP, Mr. Beplate was awarded a grant through California State University San Bernardino for development of
nanotechnology for the U.S. government and military sector. Prior to his position at EFP he was a consultant to various medical products
ﬁrms from where he was involved in research and development, and product design.
 
Louis Schiliro, Chief operating Oﬃcer since August 2018, Mr. Schiliro has been responsible for all day to day operations for
manufacturing, packaging and marketing of Hemostyp Gauze for United Health Products. He has also overseen all marketing, sales and
manufacturing strategies. He has acted as the coordinator and liaison for all Federal regulatory interactions including FDA processes.
Previously, Mr. Schiliro served as Chief Operating Oﬃcer of Hemo Manufacturing from January 2014 through December 2016, where he was
responsible for all day to day operations for manufacturing, packaging and marketing of Hemostyp Gauze as a contract vendor for United
Health Products. He was integral in developing dozens of new SKUs and package setups. From January 2012 through January 2014, he was a
Partner at ETL Response Inc. ETL is a company dedicated to speciﬁc projects by oﬀering clients a full cycle solution. ETL is a manufacturer,
seller and/or distributor for those clients which need some or all of these services. ETL works in the medical device and homeland security
ﬁelds. From 1997 through January 2012, Mr. Schiliro served as Chief Operating Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer of Global Medical USA and
Global Medical. Global Protection was a market leader in distributing protective equipment to America’s First Responders. Global Medical.
was a distributor of medical supplies and products to surgery centers in New Jersey. From 1996 through 1999, he served as a Manager of
International Sales/National Accounts Manager at SAFECO, where he was responsible for creating distribution channels in international
markets for safety and medical supplies. He has a Masters of Business in International Finance/Economics – George Mason University
(1995) and he graduated with Bachelors of Arts in International Relations/Economics – West Virginia University (1993).
 
Nate Knight, a director of the Company since December 2012 and Chief Financial Oﬃcer of the Company since 2013, brings to the
Company years of business experience and knowledge of the Company’s HemoStyp product. Mr. Knight was a principal in Med Spring, Inc.,
the Company that originally developed the HemoStyp gauze products prior to the Company’s acquisition of the rights to same. Mr. Knight
has been a public accountant for over 30 years and has owned and operated his own accounting business. Mr. Knight previously held a
Series 7 license and since February 2012, he has been employed by an internal auditor with Prime Alliance Bank. Between 2004 and 2010,
Mr. Knight served as Chief Financial Oﬃcer of MedSpring Group Inc., a privately-owned medical device company. Mr. Knight with his
extensive accounting experience and knowledge of the Company’s HemoStyp product line as well as its potential applications, makes him
an ideal candidate to continue to serve on our Board of Directors as an independent director.
   
 
26
 
   
Robert J. Denser, a director of the Company since November 2014. Mr. Denser graduated from the University of California, Santa
Barbara in 1993 with a BA degree in Business Economics. Over the past 10 years his main focus has been to assist federal and state
agencies, ﬁrst responders, EMS agencies and hospitals with their planning and procurement of the necessary medical equipment needed to
be adequately prepared for any type of natural or man-made disaster. This includes working with the Medical Directors and their teams
from the State of California and Los Angeles County with the development and fulﬁllment of a $60 million project that will give hospitals
the caches of medical equipment needed to properly respond to the surge of patients that will result from a disaster. For the past ﬁve years
Mr. Denser has been a member of ETL Response, LLC and has been in the role of Director of Sales and Finance. In this role he coordinates all
ETL projects as needed. ETL Response. Mr. Denser’s background experience also includes direct access to key decision makers within the
VA hospital system, as well as federal and private disaster response agencies, like FEMA and the Red Cross, that are on the front lines of
any disaster. Management believes that the foregoing experience of Mr. Denser makes him an ideal candidate to continue to serve on our
Board of Director as an independent director.
 
Directors’ and Oﬃcers’ Liability Insurance
 
We are currently looking to obtain directors’ and oﬃcers’ liability insurance insuring our directors and oﬃcers against liability for
acts or omissions in their capacities as directors or oﬃcers, subject to certain exclusions. Such insurance also would insure us against
losses which we may incur in indemnifying our oﬃcers and directors. In addition, we may enter into indemniﬁcation agreements with key
oﬃcers and directors and such persons shall also have indemniﬁcation rights under applicable laws, and our certiﬁcate of incorporation and
bylaws.
 
Corporate Governance
 
Our business, property and aﬀairs are managed by, or under the direction of, our Board, in accordance with the General Corporation
Law of the State of Nevada and our By-Laws. Members of the Board are kept informed of our business through discussions with the Chief
Executive Oﬃcer and other key members of management, by reviewing materials provided to them by management.
 
We continue to review our corporate governance policies and practices by comparing our policies and practices with those suggested
by various groups or authorities active in evaluating or setting best practices for corporate governance of public companies. Based on this
review, we have adopted, and will continue to adopt, changes that the Board believes are the appropriate corporate governance policies
and practices for our Company. We have adopted changes and will continue to adopt changes, as appropriate, to comply with the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act of 2002 and subsequent rule changes made by the SEC and any applicable securities exchange.
 
Director Qualiﬁcations and Diversity
 
The board seeks independent directors who represent a diversity of backgrounds and experiences that will enhance the quality of
the board’s deliberations and decisions. Candidates shall have substantial experience with one or more publicly traded companies or shall
have achieved a high level of distinction in their chosen ﬁelds. The board is particularly interested in maintaining a mix that includes
individuals who are active or retired executive oﬃcers and senior executives, particularly those with experience in the ﬁnance and capital
market industries.
 
In evaluating nominations to the Board of Directors, our Board also looks for certain personal attributes, such as integrity, ability and
willingness to apply sound and independent business judgment, comprehensive understanding of a director’s role in corporate governance,
availability for meetings and consultation on Company matters, and the willingness to assume and carry out ﬁduciary responsibilities.
Qualiﬁed candidates for membership on the Board will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, ancestry, national origin or
disability.
 
 
27
 
    
Risk Oversight
 
Enterprise risks are identiﬁed and prioritized by management and each prioritized risk is assigned to the full board for oversight.
These risks include, without limitation, the following:
 
   Risks and exposures associated with strategic, ﬁnancial and execution risks and other current matters that may present
material risk to our operations, plans, prospects or reputation.
    
   Risks and exposures associated with ﬁnancial matters, particularly ﬁnancial reporting, tax, accounting, disclosure, internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting, ﬁnancial policies, investment guidelines and credit and liquidity matters.
    
    Risks and exposures relating to corporate governance; and management and director succession planning.
    
   Risks and exposures associated with leadership assessment, and compensation programs and arrangements, including
incentive plans.
 
Board Leadership Structure
 
In accordance with the Company’s By-Laws, the Chairman of the Board presides at all meetings of the Board. Mr. Beplate currently
holds both the position of Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Oﬃcer. The Company has no ﬁxed policy with respect to the
separation of the oﬃces of the Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
 
Code of Ethics
 
We have adopted a Code of Ethics within the meaning of Item 406(b) of Regulation S-K of the Exchange Act. This Code of Ethics
applies to our directors and senior oﬃcers, such as the principal executive oﬃcer, principal ﬁnancial oﬃcer and persons performing similar
functions. Our Code of Ethics is available as Exhibit 14 to our Annual Report on Form 10-K ﬁled April 16, 2010.
 
Committees
 
As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the Board of Directors has no committees. Robert Denser may be deemed an independent
director of the Company as that term is deﬁned under the Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Mr. Denser is not deemed to be a ﬁnancial
expert. The term “Financial Expert” is deﬁned under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, as a person who has the following
attributes: an understanding of generally accepted accounting principles and ﬁnancial statements; has the ability to assess the general
application of such principles in connection with the accounting for estimates, accruals and reserves; experience preparing, auditing,
analyzing or evaluating ﬁnancial statements that present a breadth and level of complexity of accounting issues that are generally
comparable to the breadth and complexity of issues that can reasonably be expected to be raised by the company’s ﬁnancial statements,
or experience actively supervising one or more persons engaged in such activities; an understanding of internal controls and procedures for
ﬁnancial reporting; and an understanding of audit committee functions.
 
Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports
 
Section 16(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 requires our oﬃcers and directors, and persons who own more than ten percent
of a registered class of our equity securities, to ﬁle reports of ownership and changes in ownership with the SEC. These persons are required
by regulation to furnish us with copies of all Section 16(a) reports that they ﬁle. Mr. Beplate intends to ﬁle one or more delinquent Form
4/Form 5 ﬁlings for 2018 through 2020.
 
Communications with the Board of Directors
 
Stockholders may communicate with the Board of Directors by sending a letter to United Health Products, Inc. Board of Directors, c/o
our securities counsel, Morse & Morse, PLLC, 1400 Old Country Road, Suite 302, Westbury, NY 11590. Our securities counsel will receive the
correspondence and forward it to the Chairman or to any individual director or directors to whom the communication is directed, unless the
communication is unduly hostile, threatening, and illegal, does not reasonably relate to the Company or its business, or is similarly
inappropriate. The Chairman of the Board has the authority to discard or disregard any inappropriate communications or to take other
appropriate actions with respect to any such inappropriate communications.
 
 
28
 
  
Advisory Board
 
As the Company continues to pursue its application to have HemoStyp approved for Class III surgical uses in the United States and
abroad, it looks forward to calling upon experts in the ﬁelds of medicine, veterinary medicine and dental medicine to pursue various
opportunities in these diﬀerent markets.
 
The Company has formed an Advisory Board which consists of the following persons as of the date of this ﬁling:
  
Gerard Abate, MD Former Executive Director, Medical Aﬀairs for Fortune 500 company Quest Diagnostics, where he directed 80+ Medical
Aﬀairs group that includes 8 clinical franchise medical directors, (oncology, genetics, women’s health, cardiovascular-metabolism,
neurology, infectious disease/inﬂammation), HEOR team, publications group, MSLs, genetic counselors and project management.
   
Michael Erik Jessen MD Professor and Chairman, and Frank M. Ryburn, Jr. Distinguished Chair in Cardiothoracic Surgery and
Transplantation, Department of Cardiovascular and Thoracic Surgery, University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center.
 
Richard Massoth, DDS, MSD received his specialty training in Endodontics and his Master of Science in Dentistry from Boston University
in 1982. He has been an Adjunct Professor at the UCLA School of Dentistry and has been in clinical practice for 36 years. Dr. Massoth has
been a published author and a symposium speaker on “Endodontic Microsurgery” and “The Use of Cone Beam CT Scans in Endodontic
Diagnosis.”
   
Lawrence A Wolﬀ, DDS received his Doctor of Dental Surgery degree from the medical College of Virginia. After completing his program
at the Richmond, Virginia VA Hospital he returned to Los Angeles, CA where he started his practice in the San Fernando Valley. Dr Wolﬀ
taught at USC for ten years and then moved his practice to Providence St. Joseph’s Hospital. Dr Wolﬀ is Chairman of the Dental/Oral
Maxillo-Facial Surgery Section in the Department of Surgery at Providence St Joseph. In addition, he is a Fellow of the Academy of General
Dentistry (FAGD).
 
Clay W. Robinson, DVM has been Chief Medical Oﬃcer of Frontier BioMedical, LLC since August 1998. Dr. Robinson’s Professional career
includes, Head of Frontier BioMedical, Inc. IACUC since 2001; Holds Private Mixed Practice and self-employed since August 1998; a resident
Veterinarian at Utah State University from September 1995 to August 1998; Private Equine Practice, Kayscreek Equine Clinic, Layton, Utah,
from February 1994 to August 1995; Private Mixed Practice, Animal Health Center, LaGrande, Oregon, from June 1992 to February 1994. Dr.
Robinson Research includes, Protocol development and surgical implementation of new devices and techniques with Frontier BioMedical,
Inc., since August 1998. Surgical Harvesting of Equine ovaries and in vitro transfer of EVA (Equine Viral Arteritis) in the unfertilized oocyte.
Utah State University, Published. In vitro clearance of EVA from equine semen, Utah State University, Unpublished. He also Participated in
all animal research under the Ag Experiment Station at Utah State University from September 1995 to August 1998. He served as a Member
of Frontier BioMedical, Inc. IACUC from 1997 to 2001. His Education details includes Oregon State University, Corvallis, Oregon, May 1992
and Washington State University; Pullman, Washington June 1992 Doctor of Veterinary Medicine; Southern Utah University, Cedar City, Utah
June 1987; Bachelor of Science, Major: Biology with an agricultural emphasis.
 
In lieu of cash compensation, each medical advisor received 100,000 shares of restricted common stock as compensation for his
services to the Company.
 
 
29
 
  
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
 
The following table sets forth the overall compensation earned over the ﬁscal years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 by (1) each
person who served as the principal executive oﬃcer of the Company or its subsidiary during ﬁscal year 2019; (2) our most highly
compensated (up to a maximum of two) executive oﬃcers as of December 31, 2019 with compensation during ﬁscal year ended 2019 of
$100,000 or more; and (3) those two individuals, if any, who would have otherwise been in included in section (2) above but for the fact
that they were not serving as an executive of us as of December 31, 2019.
 
   Fiscal
Year Salary
($)  Bonus
($)  Stock
Awards
($)  Options
Awards
($)(1)  Non-Equity
Incentive Plan
Compensation
($)  Non-qualiﬁed
Deferred
Compensation
Earnings ($)  All Other
Compensation
($)(2)(3)  
Total ($) 
                                     
Douglas
Beplate 2019 $240,000  $ -0-  $388,000  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $628,000 
Chief
Executive
Oﬃcer 
2018 
$180,000  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$180,000 
                                             
Nate
Knight 2019 $60,000  $ -0-  $1,696,000  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $1,756,000 
Chief
Financial
Oﬃcer
Oﬃcer 2018
 
$60,000
  
$-0-
  
$-0-
  
$-0-
  
$-0-
  
$-0-
  
$-0-
  
$60,000
 
                                             
Louis
Schiliro 2019 $181,500  $ -0-  $194,000 $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $375,500 
Chief
Operating
Oﬃcer 
2018 
$150,000  
$40,000  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$190,000 
_____________
(1)FASB ASC Topic 718 requires the company to determine the overall full grant date fair value of the restricted stock awards and options
as of the date of grant based upon the Black-Scholes method of valuation which total amounts are set forth in the table above under
the year of grant, and to then expense that value over the service period over which the restricted stock awards and options become
vested. As a general rule, for time-in-service-based restricted stock awards and options, the company will immediately expense any
restricted stock awards and option or portion thereof which is vested upon grant, while expensing the balance on a pro rata basis over
the remaining vesting term of the restricted stock awards and options. For a description FASB ASC Topic 718 and the assumptions
used in determining the value of the restricted stock awards and options under the Black-Scholes model of valuation, see the notes to
the ﬁnancial statements included with this Form 10 K.
 
(2)Includes all other compensation not reported in the preceding columns, including (i) perquisites and other personal beneﬁts, or
property, unless the aggregate amount of such compensation is less than $10,000; (ii) any “gross-ups” or other amounts reimbursed
during the ﬁscal year for the payment of taxes; (iii) discounts from market price with respect to securities purchased from the
company except to the extent available generally to all security holders or to all salaried employees; (iv) any amounts paid or
accrued in connection with any termination (including without limitation through retirement, resignation, severance or constructive
termination, including change of responsibilities) or change in control; (v) contributions to vested and unvested deﬁned contribution
plans; (vi) any insurance premiums paid by, or on behalf of, the company relating to life insurance for the beneﬁt of the named
executive oﬃcer; and (vii) any dividends or other earnings paid on stock or option awards that are not factored into the grant date fair
value required to be reported in a preceding column.
 
(3)Includes compensation for service as a director described under Director Compensation, below.
  
 
30
 
    
For a description of the material terms of each named executive oﬃcers’ compensation arrangements, including the terms of any
contract, agreement, plan or other arrangement that provides for any payment to a named executive oﬃcer in connection with his or her
resignation, retirement or other termination, or a change in control of the company see section below entitled “Compensation
Arrangements.”
 
No outstanding common share purchase option or other equity-based award granted to or held by any named executive oﬃcer were
repriced or otherwise materially modiﬁed, including extension of exercise periods, the change of vesting or forfeiture conditions, the
change or elimination of applicable performance criteria, or the change of the bases upon which returns are determined, nor was there any
waiver or modiﬁcation of any speciﬁed performance target, goal or condition to payout.
 
Stock Bonuses
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight who is the Chief Financial Oﬃcer of
the Company, 500,000 shares issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 50,000 shares to
the Technical Product Supervisor who is the son of the oﬃce administrator. These shares, which had a fair market value of $1.09 per share
at the date of issuance, were placed in escrow and were scheduled to be released when a change of control occurs. Eﬀective April 1, 2019,
the Board of Directors vested the aforementioned shares as earned by the respective three individuals.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued Louis Schiliro 5,000,000 shares as part of his services agreement
and an additional 7,000,000 shares to two non-aﬃliated individuals. These 12,000,000 shares in the aggregate were escrowed and were to
vest only upon a change in control of the Company. These shares were valued at $1.09 per share. In March 2019, these 12,000,000 shares
were canceled and replaced with the restrictive stock unit awards described in the next paragraph.
 
In March 2019, restricted stock unit awards were granted to Douglas Beplate (33,000,000 shares), Louis Schiliro (8,000,000 shares),
four non-aﬃliated persons (8,550,000 shares), Wendy Harper, our oﬃce administrator shares (250,000 shares), our Technical Product
Supervisor and our Internet Commerce Supervisor. The latter two supervisors are Ms. Harper’s children who received restricted stock units
for an aggregate of 300,000 shares. These restricted stock unit awards vest upon the earlier of (i) a change in control of the Company by a
cash tender oﬀer, merger, acquisition or otherwise, or (ii) the Company achieving $20,000,000 in gross revenues on a go forward basis, or
(iii) the commencement of an event by a third party without the Board’s approval to eﬀect, or seek to eﬀect, a change in control of the
Company or the Company’s management in accordance with the terms of the restricted stock unit awards ﬁled as an Exhibit in this 10-K.
This compensation arrangement was also in lieu of Mr. Beplate’s bonus arrangement described herein and in replacement of our obligation
to issue 5 million shares to Mr. Schiliro pursuant to his Services Agreement.
  
Compensation Agreements – Douglas Beplate and Louis Schiliro
 
On April 16, 2018, the Company granted an executive compensation stock bonus package to Mr. Beplate which had provided that
upon the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or other change in control or merger transaction in which the Company
is involved, Mr. Beplate would receive an amount equal to 15% post issuance of the then outstanding shares of the Company’s common
stock on a fully diluted basis. This stock bonus package was in lieu of the 5% stock bonus to which Mr. Beplate was then already entitled in
the event of a sale of the Company’s assets or change in control or merger transaction per his services agreement. This bonus
arrangement, in turn, was replaced by the RSU’s described above under Stock Bonuses.
 
Messer Beplate and Schiliro are each being compensated at the monthly rate of $20,000 and $15,000 respectively, pursuant to
services agreements entered with each of them.
 
 
31
 
 
Services Agreements of Other Executive Oﬃcers and the Spouse of our CEO
 
In November 2014, the Company entered into Services agreement with Nate Knight, our Chief Financial Oﬃcer. His employment
agreement is terminable by the Company “at will.” Mr. Knight receives cash compensation of $5,000 per month. He also received 100,000
shares in January 2019 for services rendered as a director and an additional 100,000 shares as a director in November. During the year
ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight, which shares became vested in 2019.
  
The Company entered into an “at will” employment agreement with the spouse of our Chief Executive Oﬃcer for her services in
November 2014 as an oﬃce administrator under which she received 500,000 shares as a signing bonus and was originally paid a monthly
salary of $4,000, which was increased to $5,000 per month commencing in January 2016.
     
Executive Oﬃcer Outstanding Equity Awards at Fiscal Year-End
 
As of the ﬁling date of this form 10-K, the Company has no outstanding Common Stock Options, and none were issued in the year
ended December 31, 2019 or 2018 to executive oﬃcers or directors of the Company. In March 2019, restricted stock unit awards were
granted to our CEO Douglas Beplate (33,000,000 shares), our COO Louis Schiliro (8,000,000 shares), our oﬃce administrator and Mr.
Beplate’s spouse, Wendy Harper (250,000 shares), , and our Technical Product Supervisor and Internet Commerce Supervisor, an aggregate
of 300,000 shares. These two supervisors are the children of Mrs. Harper.
  
Review of Risks Arising from Compensation Policies and Practices
 
We have reviewed our compensation policies and practices for all employees and concluded that any risks arising from our policies
and practices are not reasonably likely to have a material adverse eﬀect on the Company.
 
DIRECTOR COMPENSATION
 
Cash Fees and Options
 
Currently the Company has no audit, compensation, corporate governance, nominating or other committee of the Board of Directors,
although it intends to establish an audit, compensation and corporate governance committee in the near future. No cash fees have been
paid to board members for serving on the board. The Company has rewarded its directors with restricted shares and/or options.
 
During ﬁscal 2018, the Company did not grant any of its directors’ cash, securities or other remuneration for serving on the Board.
During 2019, two directors each received 200,000 shares of common stock for services rendered and Mr. Beplate received 400,000 shares
of common stock for services rendered as CEO under an S-8 Registration Plan.
 
Travel Expenses
 
All directors are entitled to be reimbursed for their reasonable out of pocket expenses associated with attending director and
shareholder meetings in person.
  
 
32
 
   
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED STOCKHOLDER
MATTERS.
 
As of June 29, 2020, the Company had 180,128,456 shares of Common Stock outstanding. The only persons of record who presently
hold or are known to own (or believed by the Company to own) beneﬁcially more than 5% of the outstanding shares of such class of stock
is listed below. The following table also sets forth certain information as to holdings of the Company’s Common Stock of all oﬃcers and
directors individually, and all oﬃcers and directors as a group. This table does not reﬂect ownership of Restricted Stock Unit Awards of 33
million held by Mr. Beplate (and 250,000 held by his wife) or 8 million held by Mr. Schiliro.
   
Name and Address of Beneﬁcial Owner (1)
Oﬃcers and Directors: Number of
Common
Shares  
Percentage 
Nate Knight   2,300,000    1.3%
Douglas K. Beplate (2)    5,142   * 
Robert Denser   1,550,000   * 
Louis Schiliro    200,000   * 
All directors and oﬃcers as a group (four persons)   4,050,000    2.2%
___________
* Represents less than 1%
(1)
 
 Beneﬁcial ownership is determined in accordance with Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and is
generally determined by voting powers and/or investment powers with respect to securities. Unless otherwise noted, all of such
shares of common stock listed above are owned of record by each individual named as beneﬁcial owner and such individual has sole
voting and dispositive power with respect to the shares of common stock owned by each of them. Such person or entity’s percentage
of ownership is determined by assuming that any options or convertible securities held by such person or entity, which are
exercisable within sixty (60) days from the date hereof, have been exercised or converted as the case may be, but not for the
purposes of determining the number of outstanding shares held by any other named beneﬁcial owner. All addresses are c/o United
Health Products, Inc., 10624 S. Eastern Ave., Ste. A209, Henderson, NV 89052.
(2)Excludes 550,000 shares owned by his spouse. The 6,000,000 shares he received in 2013 and any shares received subsequent have
been sold or transferred in private transactions.
 
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans.
  
On August 8, 2013, the Board of Directors approved the 2013 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services Compensation Plan which
has 15,000,000 shares that may be issued under said Plan. The Plan provides for the direct issuance of shares of common stock under the
Plan and for the grant of non-statutory stock options on terms established by the Board of Directors or committee thereof. While the Plan
provides for incentive stock options, no incentive stock options may be granted under the Plan since no stockholder approval was obtained
on or before August 8, 2014. In September 2013, the Company issued 6,000,000 shares of stock under said Plan to Douglas Beplate
pursuant to his then consulting contract. No other shares have been granted under the Plan. The Company has not granted any options
under the Plan since its approval. There are currently 9 million of shares available for issuance under said plan.
 
On October 30, 2019, the Board of Directors approved the 2019 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services Compensation Plan which
has 2,000,000 shares that may be issued under said Plan. The Plan provides for the direct issuance of shares of common stock under the
Plan and for the grant of non-statutory stock options or incentive stock options on terms established by the Board of Directors or
committee thereof. The Plan has not been approved by the Company’s stockholders. The Company has not issued any options under this
Plan, but it approved the issuance of 1,525,000 shares in November 2020, 200,000 shares of which have not been issued as of the ﬁling
date of this form 10-K.  
  
 
33
 
   
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
 
Related party loans and related party convertible loans payable
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, loans payable to related parties totaled $0, $74,421 and $324,628, respectively. These
amounts are owed to Doug Beplate, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018, 2017, convertible loans payable - related parties totaled $365,785, $0 and $0, respectively. These
amounts are owed to Doug Beplate, our Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate advanced the Company a total of $657,500 and the Company made
repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling $161,135. These loans were for operating expenses of the Company, are due on demand and have no
interest rate.
 
On April 22, 2019, the Company agreed to allow Mr. Beplate to convert all previous outstanding cash loans made to the Company.
For any outstanding loans made on or before April 15, 2019, the loans are convertible at $0.50 per share and for all loans subsequent to
April 15, 2019, the amounts are convertible at $0.65 per share, in each case at the sole discretion of Mr. Beplate.  The Company’s stock
price on April 22, 2019 was $0.90 which resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $193,137 which was recorded to interest expense.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate converted $205,000 of loans payable at a conversion price of $0.50 into
410,000 shares of common stock.
 
From the April 15, 2019 through December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $490,500 which were convertible at $0.65 as
mentioned above. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $315,046 which was recorded to interest expense upon
issuance. The outstanding balance of convertible loans payable – related party was $365,785, $0 and $0 as of December 31, 2019, 2018
and 2017, respectively. There is $0 remaining as unamortized debt discount.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, Mr. Beplate gave a personal vehicle to an employee of the Company valued at $30,000 in
lieu of the Company paying travel expenses and consulting expenses. During 2018, Mr. Beplate provided loans to the Company of $15,000
and was repaid $295,207 of the outstanding loan balance. During the year ended December 31, 2017, Mr. Beplate provided loans to the
Company of $155,250 and was repaid $21,500. These loans were for operating expenses of the Company, are due on demand and have no
interest rate.
 
Accrued liabilities
 
As of December 31, 2017, $76,500 was owed to Mr. Beplate for accrued compensation. During the year ended December 31, 2018,
he received compensation of $180,000 and $71,500 of previously accrued compensation was paid, leaving a balance of $5,000.  During the
year ended December 31, 2019, $75,000 of compensation was accrued and $2,870 of previously accrued compensation was paid leaving a
balance of $77,130.
 
As of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, $24,100 was owed to Nate Knight for accrued compensation.
 
 
34
 
  
Equity transactions
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company issued 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight who is the Chief Financial Oﬃcer of
the Company, 500,000 shares issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO, 5,000,000 shares to the
Chief Operating Oﬃcer  (which were later cancelled and replaced with restricted stock units (RSU’s) as described below) and 50,000 shares
to a Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator. These shares were placed in escrow and were to be released
when a change of control occurred. Management was unable to determine when a change of control would occur and $0 was expensed as
of December 31, 2018.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight who is the Chief Financial Oﬃcer of the Company,
500,000 shares to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product
Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator, all of which were held in escrow as of December 31, 2019, became vested as
modiﬁed by the Board of Directors for services provided. Per ASC 718-20-35, the change in vesting conditions resulted in a modiﬁcation of
the stock-based compensation awards.  The modiﬁcation is considered a Type III modiﬁcation as described in ASC 718-20-55 and resulted in
recording $2,021,000 of stock-based compensation expense which was the fair value of the shares on the date of the modiﬁcation.
 
  In March 2019, the Company granted Mr. Beplate and Louis Schiliro 33,000,000 and 8,000,000 Restricted Stock Units (RSU’s),
respectively, which vest and are issuable upon the achievement of certain conditions described in Note 4. These RSU’s were included as
part of the Company’s grant of an aggregate of 50,100,000 RSUs to various oﬃcers, directors and consultants which all vest on
substantially the same terms. The RSUs granted to Mr. Beplate replaced an executive compensation stock bonus package that was granted
to Mr. Beplate in December 2018 which had provided that upon the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or other
change in control or merger transaction in which the Company is involved, or in the event that no such transaction occurred by December
31, 2019, Mr. Beplate would have been entitled to receive a number of shares equal to 15% post issuance of the then outstanding shares of
the Company's common stock on a fully diluted basis. The December 2018 executive compensation stock bonus package had, in turn,
replaced a previously issued 5% stock bonus granted to Mr. Beplate that would have been issuable in the event of a sale of the Company’s
assets or change in control or merger transaction, per his services agreement. The 8,000,000 RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro replaced the
5,000,000 shares of common stock which were previously held in escrow and subsequently cancelled. See “Note 6” regarding the granting
of the RSUs.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the Company issued a total of 1,000,000 shares of common stock to directors and
oﬃcers of the Company and 50,000 shares of common stock to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO,
and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator, for services rendered.  The shares had a fair
market value of $1,063,000.
 
Director Independence
 
Robert Denser is deemed by management to be an independent director of the Company as that term is deﬁned under Section 10 of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
 
Haynie & Company were our independent registered accountants for 2017 and 2018. The following table sets forth the fees billed by
them for ﬁscal 2017 and 2018 for the categories of services indicated. The audit fees for 2019 include $50,000 for fees billed from Haynie &
Company and an estimated $35,000 from MAC Accounting Group, LLP.
 
    Year Ended December 31,  
    2017    2018    2019  
              
Audit fees  $ 39,722  $ 40,329  $ 85,000 
Audit-related fees   -0-   -0-   -0- 
Tax fees    -0-   -0-   -0- 
All other fees   -0-   -0-   -0- 
_________
(1)Other fees include quarterly reviews.
 
Audit fees consist of fees related to professional services rendered in connection with the audit of our annual ﬁnancial statements
and the review of the quarterly ﬁnancial statements. All other fees relate to other professional services rendered.
 
Change in auditors
  
On December 17, 2019 (the “Resignation Date”) Haynie & Company resigned as the independent registered public accounting ﬁrm
for the Company. On December 20, 2019, the Company engaged MAC Accounting Group, LLP (“MAC”), Salt Lake City, Utah, as its new
independent registered public accounting ﬁrm. The change of the Company’s independent registered public accounting ﬁrm from Haynie &
Company to MAC was approved unanimously by our board of directors. No fees were paid to MAC in ﬁscal 2019 or 2018, although the costs
of the restatement for the years ending December 31, 2018 and 2017 is estimated to be $35,000.
 
Audit Committee Pre-Approval Policy
 
The Company does not have an audit committee. Audit committee functions are conducted by the Board of Directors. We understand
the need for the accounting ﬁrm to maintain objectivity and independence in its audit of our ﬁnancial statements. To minimize relationships
that could appear to impair their objectivity, our Board has restricted the non-audit services that they may provide to us.
 
 
35
 
  
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
(1)Financial Statements
 
The ﬁnancial statements of United Health Products, Inc., supplemental information and report of independent registered public
accounting ﬁrm are included in this Form 10-K.
 
(2)Financial Statement Schedules
  
Schedules have been omitted because of the absence of conditions under which they are required or because the required
information is included in the ﬁnancial statements or notes thereto.
 
(3)Exhibits
  
(a)Exhibits
 
The following exhibits are ﬁled with this report, or incorporated by reference as noted:
 
3(i)  Articles of Incorporation of the Company dated February 28, 1997. (1)
 
3(ii)  Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (1)
 
3(iii)  By-laws of the Company. (2)
 
3(iv)  August 2015 Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (3)
 
10.1  Services Agreement with Louis Schiliro (5)
 
10.2  Services Agreement – Nate Knight (4)
 
10.3  January 2015 Services Agreement with Douglas Beplate (6)
 
10.4  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Louis Schiliro (7)
    
10.5  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Douglas Beplate (7)
 
21  Subsidiaries of the Registrant – none
 
31.1  Certiﬁcation of Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
 
31.2  Certiﬁcation of Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
 
32.1  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
 
32.2  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
 
99.1  2019 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (8)
 
 
36
 
 
101.SCH Document, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
101.CAL Calculation Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Deﬁnition (*)
101.DEF Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels (*)
101.LAB Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
101.PRE Presentation Linkbase (*)
___________
* Filed herewith.
 
(1)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014.
(2)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
(3)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated August 7, 2015 – date of earliest event ﬁled on August 10, 2015.
(4)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated November 23, 2014.
(5)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018.
(6)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated January 16, 2015.
   
(7)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
   
(8)Incorporated by reference to Form S-8 dated October 31, 2019.
 
 
37
 
  
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has caused this Report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
Dated: July 9, 2020 By:/s/ Douglas Beplate
Douglas Beplate
Principal Executive Oﬃcer
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:
 
Signatures Title Date
By:/s/ Douglas Beplate Principal Executive Oﬃcer and July 9, 2020
Douglas Beplate Chairman of the Board
By:/s/ Nate Knight Principal Financial Oﬃcer and Director July 9, 2020
Nate Knight
By:/s/ Robert Denser Director July 9, 2020
Robert Denser
 
Douglas Beplate, Nate Knight and Robert Denser represent all the current members of the Board of Directors.
 
 
38
  
